Making a debut as the “it” apparel event, Festival Québec Mode General Director, Karine Albert, could not be more elated. “The turnout is more than we anticipated”, Ms. Albert said with a smile.
3 cups diced tomatoes (frozen tomatoes from the garden)
This interdisciplinary documentary combines speculative travelogue and investigative journalism in order to trace possible links between survivalism, spirituality, art, radical politics, outlaw culture, alternative media and fringe philosophy.
One other note: the author is a TV executive. Suddenly it makes sense to me why nearly everything on TV sucks. Sure, there’s Breaking Bad, Sons of Anarchy, Mad Men, Game of Thrones, Community, etc. But for every good show there are like ten reality shows, and I would rather watch a video of myself getting shot in the leg than a reality show.
Not only are cold quaffs considered to be un-beneficial to the body, but the same goes for cold weather. Early in our stay here (August, September) it was winter. On Sundays, we would take the opportunity provided by our local government and stroll up and down a section of street that was closed to auto traffic making it a paradise for bicyclists, skateboards, roller skaters, and people walking their dogs.
Our bedroom looked like this before we bought it...
What I have seen through this whole audition thing is that there are so many talent youngsters having so much enthusiasm about music and it's making me force myself to practice a lot more not to be left behind. Nonetheless, simultaneously I am so satisfied with the fact that I can say that the music scene here in the future is gonna be brighter than now.
Great so they want to medicate the entire bread eating population for 14 babies. OVERKILL.
“Some people have told me that I have changed as a person. But I know I am still the same. I do what I do, say what I say and write what I write because I don’t want to die uselessly.
collider.com
my heart feels complete once again
It had the effect of a royal order.
Remember to keep some form of ID on your pet, either tags, a tatoo or microchip.
What a big boy.
To ensure you the most effective price, without having to sacrifice clothes for babies of the best cases, make a price comparison prior to buying using the net.
Thus you have to assume the true motivation of organisations like alcohol concern is one of gradual denormalisation of alcohol and eventual prohibition. You have to assume CAMRA are not interested in responsible drinking and are disingenuous in their statements and basically think that you are dumb enough to think pub prices are “great value” if only those damn supermarkets didn’t let you know just how cheap the products really are.
303) grandpa popping in for coffee, bearing cookies!
After looking at me as if she had doubts about what she was taking on, she told me she hadn't but there were some people in the church porch and it might have been one of them. So I went to have a look. I have seldom seen a group of people less likely to contain a crying woman.
shirt: my p.e shirt from the u.s
This Manual Includes:
4,500 unions. That must have been quite a sight. And a considerable investment. Notice that Bickerdyke says they were used for cleansing, not fermentation. An important distinction, that.
Smells a little skunked. Damn Specs. Clear, gold color, fleeting head. Mouthfeel is kinda medium, but not quite there for me. Some esteryness in there but not much. A little bready AT, low hops. Maybe some light citrus and sourness. Kinda high in carbo, and low-mod drinkability. Not my favorite from St. Arn. I’m gonna 2 star it. For the record. I tried another bottle later on and it was a lot better. Still closer a high 2 for me.
The simplest way to control dissent or scrutiny is to dismiss comments as conspiracy theories. That ensures that the person in question is not taken seriously by the media etc. Easy peasy. However, more and more are waking up and are beginning to question everythiNG which seems to have prompted some US politicians to attempt to silence dissenters. The question is: If you are silencing dissent then what have you got? Not a democracy – that’s for sure.
Anyway, it’s kind of a mess of a movie from any technical standpoint – the sound, in particular, is crap, which is unfortunate in a movie about music – but it’s cheeky and entertaining as hell. And who doesn’t like seeing a fifteen-year-old Diane Lane run around in a leotard for the better part of an hour and a half?
Executing Your Social Computing Strategy is the 50th in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at http://bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
Monkey arrived shortly after I posted yesterday, and J got home not long after that... We were playing around and having fun before dinner, and Monkey was running through the house. He was running full tilt in the living room when he tripped over his tricycle and face planted into a speaker. Of course, the corner of the speaker hit him right in the mouth. He was on his knees with his hands over his mouth, and I grabbed him up. When I was finally able to pull him away from me long enough to look at his face, I saw that he was bleeding. Lots. Not scary amounts, but mouth wounds bleed a lot.
Bella hates the smell, the look, and the taste of oysters. But she was fiercely committed to learning how to open them. She quietly left the room when Dash started using his front teeth to beaver-scrape the gooey bodily remains out of each shell.
Casino giant Genting Singapore directed its issue squarely at small-time investors who were attracted by the hefty 5.125 per cent interest payment, known as a coupon rate, offered by the shares.
Well, obviously I had to include something by JG Thirlwell and have been thoroughly spoilt for choice this year. (I would have included something by Manorexia but it didn’t flow with the other tracks.) DJ Food’s Magpies, Maps & Moons EP was fine enough in its own right, but Thirlwell’s snarling growls against the baa-baa-baa backing vocals really make this something special. Of all Thirlwell’s collaborations in the past 12 months, this is the most moreish.
1 cup whipping cream
Golf course officials could not be reached for comment.
Special features include: deleted scenes; “Purr-fect Pairings: The Voices Behind The Legends”; “Puss in Boots: The Three Diablo’s”; “Kitten to Cat: The Progression of Puss in Boots”; “Glitter Box Dance Off!”; “Klepto Kitty”; “Kitty Keyboard”; “Fairytale Pop-Up”; “Kitty Strikes Again”; “Puss’ Paw-Pouncing Challenge”; “The Animator’s Corner”; trivia track; and digital copy of the film. (DreamWorks Animation)
Anyway, I guess that is all. See, I posted a happy blog. Next time you hear from me, I will be back in California.
Context on the show: Homer offers this very special advice after Bart fails – due in large part to Homer – in his audition to become Mr. Burns’ heir.
Huang recently showcased his work at the 2010 Shanghai Wold Expo. On his can-do attitude, he says:
I settled on my new OPRC tank top, and arm warmers. I did one last portapotty stop before realizing I'd forgotten my Clif Shot Bloks at home. Thankfully Helen was kind enough to share hers. After looking at the course map I'd decided that there would be enough water stations that I wouldn't need my fuel belt. But I wasn't sure I was ready to give up the Shot Bloks.
“I don’t know dear, why don’t you ask, I’ll forgive the indecorous question and only show mild surprise at a lady using such language and I’ll do my best to answer”
So you did all the right things, sent in your invoice, politely queried it's non-payment, accepted a few facile excuses and it's now some time later and they still haven't paid you. What next?
I might have to take some of my mad praizzz back. See I wrote all that yesterday, after I'd recieved TWO of the passports in the mail a mere one day after applying for them. I thought that was pretty freaking impressive.
30(For I did not let my mouth give way to sin, in putting a curse on his life;)
“Dear death, like peace, I end not speaking,
Perhaps even more fascinating than what Fassbinder puts up on the screen are the influences one can sense in sci-fi films that both preceded and followed World on a Wire: Alphaville (1965), 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968), Blade Runner (1982), Total Recall (1990), The Matrix (1999). But could Wong Kar-Wai, of all directors, have picked up something from Fassbinder too? The proliferation of mirror-reflection shots in World on a Wire, to my mind, greatly recall similar ones in Wong's In the Mood for Love (2001) and 2046 (2005). Fassbinder's sensibility, of course, is far cooler than Wong's superheated romanticism—but maybe they're not so far apart after all: At the conclusion of this majestic sci-fi epic, love wins out in the end, in its own way.
Length : 33"-35"
I wonder if my life could really change, at all.
I was moved to tears so many times. I'll admit it. There might have been wine involved, but there were definitely tears. Tears when the pregnancy took. Tears when their daughter was born. Tears and tears and more tears. She overcame huge hurdles - and she shares them with such honesty and fearlessness that it's no wonder she is in her third decade with her wife.
So it’s Cybil Disobedience time and Marshall was in glee club and he’s not a horrible singer – not Kandy – but he passes off “I Will Survive” the best he can and plus, this is all on video. This entire scene with everyone getting a kick out of Marshall doing this and being super stiff was just so awesome to watch.
1/4 cup agave sweetener (for Ginger Cocoa Bites, please see instructions below and make syrup first.)
Spicy fried calamari was paired with Knappstein Reserve Lager (number 5 for those playing at home) and the crisp richness of the beer was a pleasant partner for the bright flavours of the food. The mix of first-timers and returning guests was about fifty-fifty but fortunately the ‘regulars’ had forgotten most of my witty gags and I was able to recycle most of the really good ones as we moved into the second half of the dinner.
A.: I rarely read anything in a series. I don’t like to commit myself to a reading project that will require me to stay with or continually re-visit one author or genre for such an extended period of time.
This year has seen its fair amount of stress – there’s the fear of a double-dip recession, the Eurozone debt crisis and record numbers of job cuts and unemployment. TV seems gloomy this year with programmes like a ‘Grumpy Guide to Christmas’ to remind us all of everything we dislike about the holidays. And then there’s the fact that my family just aren’t really ‘in’ to
our new book for the month of may is
A couple of additions to the new-look format included a ‘Comments & Queries’ opportunity and a Beer Trivia quiz held in three parts over the night. Perhaps the most highly anticipated and eagerly awaited was the new ‘Show & Tell’ segment where an Ale Star would take to the floor for a brief beer related presentation. This bit turned out to be the highlight of the night – possibly of the whole Ale Stars experience! Ever!! More later.
- Double
a front porch and a gravel road
Fiamme Hard Silver 700C tubular rims (340gr; 36-hole; eyelets).
I'll follow this post up in a few days with photo's of some of the posters I found in the loft....
Ms Lam writes: "Thus, even assuming that the use of the subject mark was liable to mislead the public, the applicant had also failed to establish that the alleged deceptiveness of the mark was the consequence of the use made by it by the registered owner."
After this came breakfast and a little while later I was back at Dr. O‘s office getting December’s stitches taken out. I think she’s starting to worry that if she takes out many more I will unravel completely. However, this time she was more concerned about a small infection. They can get quite serious quite quickly in that leg so now I have a week’s worth of antibiotics (which the pharmacist pithily described as smelling like cat’s p**s) to take.
Do tell:- What is writing to you? What does it mean to you?
MAIN HALLWAY: "Intruder Alert! Contact Main Hallway! Security to Main Hallway!" Four GOBLINs are roaming the Main Hall Corridor and all will attack together once the others are summoned to its location..
1920's Adults Night Murder Mystery Party, me and my girlfriends threw at Stacy's.
Stephon Gilmore was chosen by the Buffalo Bills with the #10 pick. The South Carolina cornerback rated favorably with Morris Claiborne and was the top player at his position according to some draft boards. Buffalo made a big splash in free agency by adding superstar defensive end Mario Williams. Gilmore continues Buffalo’s plan to revamp it’s defense. Gilmore should begin to solidify a defensive backfield that was abused at times in 2011.
Great bars I have known and loved: Mirror, Barefoot Beach Bar in Placencia, Belize, and Rumours Wine Bar. You may not agree with my list; but it doesn’t matter. Your list isn’t mine, nor mine yours. It’s not about who mixes the best cocktail or offers the speediest service, although those aspects are delightful. No, the aspect I’m concerned with is a nameless intangible, a place’s tendency to engender Goodness, to act as a sort of petri dish for culturing Magical Nights. If there were a formula, it might look something like this:
One of my favorite new blogs this year is Retraction Watch, written by Adam Marcus and Ivan Oransky, both carrying substantial science editing and journalism credentials. If you’re a scientist and you’re not following it, you really should. Anyway, last week brought the retraction of another high-profile and controversial immunology paper (which happened to be the fourth retraction from Nature this year and came in the same issue as an editorial about the increase in retractions). Oransky posted a response from Tom Decoursey, an author of a study that challenged the findings of the now-retracted paper. Decoursey makes a strong case for the importance of removing wrong answers from the literature. There was one thing he said that struck a dissonant chord with me. Decoursey says, in reference to this particular, retraction (emphasis mine):
“Sure. If you need help, I’ll be right here.”
presidential adviser, Mr. Oronto Douglas, who, he said,
Goal: Create the frame and panel structures for each page.
where the winner will win two template of their choice!!
Having said that, it has also cost me a fortune in shirts… I am now a shirt anorak, nursing a slight addiction. But perhaps more of that another time….
Serve with sliced green onions as garnish.
I belong to the Potter.
All of that was enough to drive her from bed and go and stand outside the closed bathroom door, calling my name and asking if I were all right. When no response came she tried the door. It wasn't locked (it rarely is), and when it swung open (and when she'd switched on the light? Again, which of us turned on the main light is unclear), Rachel was met by a vision of gore that we've since compared – lightheartedly, but not inaccurately – to the chest-burster scene in Alien. I was sprawled on my back on the floor (having most likely passed out from a standing position; there's a bruise/scratch on my side from where I must have hit something on the way down), my head wedged between the toilet and the bath, at the centre of an explosion of blood and bits covering most of me and most of the bathroom. My eyes were open but staring blankly at nothing, and blood and vomit gurgled in my open mouth and throat.
“Is that possible?” asked the man. “Dextrocardia”, I mutter. “Are you a doctor?” No, I just like big words, I am in the second class carriage after all. I read stuff and remember it. A wonderful lesson to the students: never bluff, and never assume that things are Normal- after all, people go to hospital because something is abnormal. And a good lesson to me, on the social pressures on doctors and others to Seem to know what is going on.
The closest I've ever found is an oval table cloth, made of plastic, with the crochet pineapple motif stamped on it (see picture above). I have owned this table cloth for about 10 (or more) years, and of yet to ever see another in-person. From time to time I will bring it to crochet demonstrations I volunteer for to show the closest I've ever seen what a machine can produce. It's fake. Want to see other samples of fake crochet? Go to google.com, click onto "images" and then search for "pvc crochet table cloth."
We think of someone who isn’t generally quiet, who will appears to not allow anything to faze them, almost an air of self-assured arrogance.
I feel good knowing I'm doing my body and mind so much good!
"Chicha" is a catch-all word that refers to a variety of fermented drinks popular in many Latin American countries. The drink of choice among the working class, they tend to be cheap and potent.
Underneath this church have been found the remnants of a church dated to approximately 1100. Tombs have also been found under the church, including those of children. Additionally, the remains of fetuses have been found, along with evidence of a ceremonial burial as well. It is likely that the well-known Duke of Skule, from the sagas, was married in Høre stave church in the 1200s.
One of my favorite songs is How Beautiful by Twila Paris. I’ve sang it many times for Lord’s Supper, weddings and Mikie’s cousin Tiffany sang it our wedding while Mikie and I shared our first Lord’s Supper as a married couple.
Her smile was dazzling. There was something about her words that made me believe everything she said.
Needlework is slow but steady as dodgy eye plays up regularly.
This question prompted him to get his little blue suitcase out of his closet. With our advice of not to pack too many books because it would be too heavy, he decided on: one book, baby jaguar (a stuffed tiger that we call a jaguar), 1 matchbox car, 4 pairs of "baseball shorts", a t-shirt and 6 pairs of underwear. He figured he'd only be gone 5 days, so that was enough. I asked where he planned to stay and he told me he'd just stay at the first good place he came too.
That was the worst Valentine's Day EVER. Okay, the whole day wasn't bad, but since the highlight was getting puked on by Ocean, I'm calling the whole day a loss.
random things.
Troll seems to be conveying a true story maybe? Interesting that it was hot, sweaty sex as opposed to the regular kind. Maybe she (and I'm assuming Riko is a girl) was the racist here. Troll raises all kinds of questions that maybe he'll clarify for us - or not. By the way, I couldn't access the link for the visual.
”To stabilize the euro, we must not take anything off the table in the short run. That includes, as a worst-case scenario, an orderly default for Greece if the necessary instruments for it are available.” Right now, Greece is caught in a death spiral. The more austerity measures they implement, the more their economy slows down. The more their economy slows down, the more their tax revenues go down. The more their tax revenues go down, the worse their debt problems become.
For a 6 qt crockpot
Thanks to all who stopped by and offered their opinions, or those who just read in silence. There have been testy debates and moments of enlightenment for blogger and commenters. Which is exactly what I wanted. So again, thanks.
Winter's look is "Elegance" The bold colors of winter accent the striking color scheme of the season.
Between trains
win TWO different ways!
Think about an auction – one object, many bidders. The bid price rises in the course of the auction without the object saying a thing in its own defense. The final price may be significantly more than the starting bid – but not because the object was ‘worth less’ at the start of the auction than at the end. Or even that competition raised its value. It was simply that the buyer recognised its value to him, and was willing to pay what he needed to pay to secure it. And you can bet that the buyer will look after it, because he knows its value… and that the object will stay in top condition for a long time to come, and possibly be sold again in time for an even higher price. Especially if it’s been kept in prime condition or been improved.
2012 has been full of adventures. So far this year I have plunged into Twitter, Google Documents, Wiki, and now I am a blogger.
Here are some pics of right after the introduction while we were in the van on the way back to the hotel. You can see the deer in the headlights look on her face.Happily, and surprisingly, this did not last very long. Erin came back to the suite with us, and talked to her occasionally. We just let her hang out and get used to everything. At one point, she needed to use the toilet and Erin took her back. On the way there, Erin pointed out the clothes that I had brought for her, which were folded on a stand. Once she saw all of the pink clothes everything changed!
Today was a busy day.
Tom Barney: bass
Austria demands Serbia buy it a complete new suit, because there are splashes on its trouser leg.
Adapted from my dear friend Febe’s recipe
Oddly enough though, the subject that I heard about the most as a kid – the actual subject of this post, isn’t listed in that encyclopedia. And that is the subject of dreams. But no problem. All anyone has to do is look up “Dream” on Google, or “Dream” on Wikipedia, to see that the subject of dreams has not been neglected. Oh no, not by a long shot. I even hear there’s an iPhone app in the works that allows you to program them in advance!
15. Is there a food that you hated as a child but now like?
BUT I haven't continued the loss.....and I have to say, I haven't really been trying.
Chris Miser
15 And when the servant of the man of God was risen early, and gone forth, behold, an host compassed the city both with horses and chariots. And his servant said unto him, Alas, my master! how shall we do?
Here's the finished creatures -
Earth in earth is earth to earth
It was not until later in 2007 that the full Stormzone line-up was
The 2012 NBA Playoffs are underway and I’ve been reading a lot of underlying stories that could take place given certain circumstances. Will LeBron finally get his first elusive ring? Will Tim Duncan and Gregg Popovich upgrade their legacy by grabbing their 5th title together? Can the Bulls win without former MVP Derrick Rose? Can Kobe get his 6th Ring and finally catch up to Michael Jordan? That last one is the one that bugs me the most and has been for several years now. There is no question Kobe Bryant wants to be compared to Jordan, if not surpass him when it comes to their ring collection. Does Kobe winning a 6th ring make it fair to evaluate Kobe on an even playing field with Jordan? Does 6 rings for both men mean they are equal superstars? Is Kobe really being compared to being the next Jordan? I mean all rings aside the two aren’t even in the same league. I’ve heard it all too. Kobe had developed a better jumper earlier in his career than Jordan did. Kobe this and Kobe that. I’m not saying everybody actually believes Kobe could be considered an equal or even better than Jordan, but the media seems to like to compare the two when really there is no comparison at all. The only thing Kobe has over Jordan is the number on his jersey.
And what makes them special, you might ask. The answer is the moist muscovado sugar and the touch of fleur de sel. Muscovado--unrefined sugar obtained from sugarcane--is moist, coarse, and perfect with chocolate and coffee.
Megatron has been released differently in the US and Japan. He was not released in the First Edition line in the US, but was released as a First Edition Deluxe by Takara. He was supposed to released in a Hasbro Entertainment Pack as a deluxe figure with Optimus Prime and the kids from the Cartoon. So far that has not happened. Next he came out as a RID voyager figure in the US, then an Arms Micron deluxe figure in Japan.
Hey Diva's! Happy Sunday to you all, before I head out for church this morning I wanted to tell you all about the Greatness that's going on this week w/ us Getting Cricky Girls! This week we are Featuring all different Projects using K Andrew Stamps before Our Blog Hop on Friday January 20th! We were challenged to make projects this whole week using 1 Stamp Set Only by K Andrew Designs! Each Girl got to choose which Set she wanted to use and I chose the Scripture Sayings Stamp Set. This Set has so many Bible Verses on it that are PERFECT for All Types of Cards!
We accept the following types of crotches:
For my card I changed the blue that she use to Melon Mambo and used the Upsy Daisy stamp set rather than the one she used. In addition I added a sentiment to my card where she had none. Whisper White was used as my card base and I matted my Melon Mambo pieces of cardstock with basic black, which makes the Melon really pop off the card! I stamped the Upsy Daisy image with basic black and the sentiment in basic black as well. The scallop border punch was used and I added liquid pearls to each of the little scallops to match what ltecler did on her card. Self adhesive metal accents were used on my card rather than brads. A combination of black satin ribbon and black ribbon with white polka dots was used. I also sprayed the main stamped image with home made shimmer spray to make it sparkle. Yes, I know, I can't stop using this stuff. Give it a try, it will become addictive!!!
STUDY I
01 - March
A: I signed those deals before I came to this conclusion. I highly doubt I'll ever sign another print deal.
Until later….
It seemed a perfectly normal old place, albeit one with dirty floors covered with beer cans, cigarette butts, and frayed centerfolds. But just off the second-floor hallway I saw a door that led to a staircase to the attic; I was too scared to go any further. At best I was afraid I’d find rats and weak floor boards, at worst, human skulls, pentagrams, and the fragments of sacrificial goats. I ran out of there like a frightened little girl. (I later learned the dark secret of the attic–it was where the frat boys took their young lady friends to get better acquainted.)
“You still have yet to actually take my statements from my first post and disprove them in their ENTIRETY.” I see no point to disproving your post, because, as I have stated multiple times, I have read and debunked them before. I see no point in repeating myself for someone that is not going to change their mind, no matter what arguments I give them and no matter how many of their claims I refute.
We all looked to Bill for guidance.
The hills miles clocked in at 8:02. I remember during the last 0.1 of the mile desperately trying to get my split below 8 and obviously failing. But still, I’m actually pleased with that hilly mile. I also tried to take water on the run doing that “fold to make a spout” thing with my cup and getting water up my nose. Epic fail.
In these cases, you basically have a single shot at getting lucky. You rolls the dice and takes your chances on the genetic lottery, and then you’re stuck with what you get. It’s a one-off thing. But the principle also applies to repeated experiments, where you measure the same thing at different times, rather than just in different people.
Edward F. Beyea, 42, New York, N.Y.
The point I was originally trying to make is that if you've read all my shit, you've clearly read this post. And if you've read that, you clearly remember two characters I introduced in that post: Alice and Fuckle.
If the European (and American) debt crises seem endless, with Big Banks the only relentless winners, then read up about Iceland, given up for dead after their foolish bankers (who called themselves “geniuses”) leveraged the country into tsunamis of red ink. What this article doesn’t talk about is the “gender aspect”. In effect,, the women of Iceland simply took over. Grabbed the reins of politics and finance out of the hands of their “genius” husbands and sent them back to the fishing boats, where they belonged.
THEN, I completely stripped the chair to find the upholstery webbing in pretty sad shape.
The Varnish works fine, again compared with Vallejo it sprays thicker but I have had no issues with clouding or post spray disasters. Price wise it's £7.65 so just over a £1 saving. Again that nagging feeling it failed to cover as many figures but in fact out lasted the primer buy two units. Given the need to go over the figures less than with the Vallejo leaves me thinking I am right about the coverage being lower. This would mean the £1 saving is eaten into with a need to replace the sooner. Another issue but one of taste, the Matt finish is more Satin than true Matt which for some is a plus point but if you want flat matt this is probably not your spray.
Yes, I’m a shock to those newly initiated
I think we can create jobs in the public sector. We can give help to the private sector too.He is then asked whether he is backing an “increase in the size of the public sector”, and replies:
So Zander and I were able to venture out to play for a little bit.
Diet cokes now consumed, she heads towards the study.
The catch is, they sell them in threes. It’s three cookies for $1.95. Sure, I could have paid the same (reasonable) amount and just taken two. But that would go against all of my gluttonous principles.
Response Paper 3 (Cinephilia) . . . 15%
We do not want to hate, we do not want to feel all of this feelings, we do not want to be victims anymore. ENOUGH! Enough pain, enough tears, enough suffering, enough control, limitations, unjust justifications, terror, torture, excuses, bombings, sleepless nights, dead civilians, black memories, bleak future, heart aching present, disturbed politics, fanatic politicians, religious bullshit, enough incarceration! WE SAY STOP! This is not the future we want!
I remember when you came to see me
The blue glow from the TV illuminates her sad face. I hate this part. Waking her up. She always starts crying when she looks at me. But we need to go to bed.
An easing in energy prices aided a decrease in the producer price index for finished goods (PPI) in October. The Bureau of Labor Statistics reported a seasonally adjusted 0.3% decline in the PPI in October, driven by a 1.4% (SA) decrease in the prices for finished energy goods. The index for finished goods has fluctuated in recent months, but has shown little change since May following the peak in oil prices. Overall, the PPI is up 5.9% relative to October 2010, which is largely a reflection of the strong growth during the first four months of this year.
Now let's see how arresting the plot is: Detroit - in an undisclosed point in the near future - is a dark and despairing wasteland of crime, graft and corruption, with a police force who is woefully undermanned and ill-prepared to combat it. To this end, Omni Consumer Products (OCP) announces its purchase of a central police department, which promptly goes on strike. This all happens as a new cop, Murphy (Weller) is transferred to this precinct and partnered with rough-and -tumble Lewis (Nancy Allen)... and promptly killed on his first assignment out on the streets.
I just did what comes naturally
I am excited about this new program I found: Loupe.
Life is inspired.
And as a public service, just to help the Chairman, who very soon will have precisely 15 minutes to prove he can send record Brent prices down by 50% and prevent the European economy from imploding, here is a convenient reminder from the BBC, courtesy of its clip “How Goldman Sachs Helped Mask Greece’s Debt.” You know – just in case someone forgot to hold the Fed accountable for its objective and sincere investigation into the firm, whose former chief economist now runs the New York Fed.
That fact, and its statutory expression in the form of eminent domain laws, means that the “bundle of rights” reposing in real property is finally reducible to the litigated money value of the property in question. There are few property rights that cannot be reduced to a dollar value by the political exercise of power and the observation of the form of “due process of law.”
ERIKA ALEXANDER (Zandalee)
Never underestimate the amount of revision that’s needed, to go from first draft to something worth submitting. For most of us – it's a lot.
The United Kingdom gave 1.23 billion pounds in aid through the European Union in 2010.
What about your craft projects dreams any great ambitious ideas or just a bunch of little things you hope to achieve? I would love to know what you plan for 2012.
When the world puts pressure on you to conform, follow the example of Daniel. Strengthen your integrity and your character. Do what it says in Romans 12:1-2. Start off each day by surrendering your body to the Lord (present your bodies a living sacrifice). Renew your mind in the Word of God every day. Pray. Daniel was automatic. He prayed three times every day, no matter what. Then “prove” God’s will – put it in action. Prove God’s will, not your own will.
Now you look at these names and ask "Who is the best". And in my opinion, you come to Andre Ward, Andre Dirrell, and Lucian Bute. Yes, Carl Froch is undefeated but as I have said before, I'm not sold on his boxing skills. He's too rough around the edges, leads with his face, dosen't cut off the ring well, doesn't utilize his jab very much, hasn't shown good movement, and has a very 'stiff' fighting style. I'm going to need to see more of him before I mention his name with these guys. Many may say he beat Dirrell, I personally think the judges got caught up in the roar of the crowd. When I watch the Dirrell/Froch fight with the volume on mute, I scored it 8 rounds to 4 in favor of Andre Dirrell. I would have liked to see Lucian Bute in the middleweight tournament, because as of now, I don't believe he's fought any true competition. The only fighter that he has fought that is ranked top 10 (on Boxrec) is Sakio Bika. We seen Dirrell's mobility, fast hands, and boxing skills against Froch, and we seen his focus and smarts against Abraham. Ward destroyed MIkkell Kessler, who (to many) was viewed as the best Super Middleweight in the world prior to that fight. Ward showed that he can use his speed on the outside, or power on the inside. Ward fought like a veteran with 40+ fights when he is only a 26 year old with less than 30 fights. He fought a very smart fight. Then you have Lucian Bute, I believe he has more power than the other two guys that I"m comparing to him (Ward & Dirrell). Bute has fast hands, good footwork, uses angles well and has shown knockout power. I don't believe its really the "power" that is getting Bute all these knockouts, I think its a combination of his fast hands and ability to use angles. But he has never fought someone faster than him, where in my opinion his speed is equal or lesser to Ward & Dirrell. We will be seeing Ward vs Dirrell in the 4th quarter of 2010 and I hope to see the two of them eventually take on Lucian Bute. But I believe we may see Chad Dawson vs Lucian Bute before Bute has a chance to fight Ward or Dirrell.
The true leader of a Nationalist Party is that one that realises that no-one wins a victory if the credibility, integrity and unity of the party is damaged during the leadership process.
His audacity to proclaim himself a ‘winnable candidate anywhere’ is nothing short of disgusting.
Over these past few days I have received countless emails, blog comments, and FB messages, many from complete strangers all over the world: Japan, United Kingdom, Australia, Philippines, maybe more? (If so, I’d love to hear from you!). I am floored to see 762 Facebook shares on my blog the other day, and an average of 20,000 hits each day on the blog since the day Nora was born! That is just crazy awesome, people!!!!
One of these days, I will write about the Morsel Guy. He was a Craigslist find and recently started contacting me again - but he's being very subtle about it - so I'm letting that train wreck play out.
I won’t even begin to complain about the wonderful postal workers that carry our mail in snow, sleet, rain and in the gloom of night. Or the exceptional service that we don’t get 4 miles away. I now drive 7 miles one direction or 14 miles the other direction to the post office to avoid the guy that is breathing good air.
The Associate
This is a great tool that I’ve shared with all of my colleagues and family members who will soon be on their way to college.
This benefit show pays homage to the Cougar, with all proceeds benefiting homeless domestic cats. To raise funds and help this excellent work continue, we invite one and all to experience two different nights of a spectacular mix of Burlesque, Drag, Impersonations, Aerial, Juggling, Comedy and Belly dancing!
While I really love the idea of big families, I am also well aware of my limits.
This book is composed of essays, most of which I didn’t read. Some interesting facts or opinions about and around whisky:
Perhaps that’s the case here – that someone just doesn’t know any better and wouldn’t know class if it bashed them in the head and gave them a skull fracture and a closed head injury. If so, what do you do about that, other than hope one has advisors around that can discourage such a massive faux pas before it gets out, which obviously isn’t the case here.
Now I’ve interviewed many witnesses who say that the thing seems to interact with them, as if it was conscious of their presence. The lights can have different form, the most typical is one about the size of a basketball, but they can also have a smaller form.
I was surprised to discover how much I enjoyed the work. It was reasonable to assume most of our patients had not visited a doctor in quite some time, so it was gratifying to be in a position to help them attend to problems that had been unaddressed for so long.
For most responsible men, once you tell them that you are pregnant, a sense of manhood and ownership takes control over us. It triggers our brains to get ready to become the provider that we are meant to be. It may take him a few days or even a week to get his brain together. But be there with him, as he will be there for you, and talk to him about everything you are thinking as far as theabout your future together. If you are worried about the money and all that keep this in mind, the military always looks out for family! They will help with medical for you and the baby, housing, etc. Also, if you do decide to work together on this and the military does help you guys out. They will also do this in the event he gets deployed, as long as you are living together and have proof that he is the father (paternity test). My advice for living together is to discuss moving in to basic housing, which is provided by the military, to make your living arrangements easier for the both of you.
“She’s awake,” Tattletale called out. I hurried to the kitchen, leaving Bitch where she was.
It really is too long for a blog post, yet unlike last year's talk, I really don't feel like this one can be broken up into multiple posts. So, I shall simply post it all despite it's length, with a "read more" option so people who aren't interested don't have to scroll forever to get to older posts... So, here it is!
I do think this song would make a wonderful duet, and it surprises me nobody has ever tried to record it for two voices. If I am wrong and you know the two-voice arrangement for this song, please, don’t hesitate to share! I can’t wait!
I also think this paper is important for managers and change agents because they can see how management-led efforts to increase workplace diversity can have their intended effects, but also lead to unintended adverse side effects. Examples of both are discussed in the paper. This means that diversity management and planned change overlap. Planned diversity change involves relying on positive intended effects and building upon them, but also working to reduce the impact of the adverse effects on future change efforts.
Alternative and home treatments for warts may also be used. These methods have been used for many years. These may include the use of vinegar, garlic and other ingredients. Some of these methods are an effective flats wart cure.
If we don't, we reduce history to virtually nothing. And we have to look in a broader context. That first mention of 'India Pale Ale' came at least seventy years after strong, hoppy pale had been exported to the Indian market - so how can we assert when this beer called 'IPA' first appeared?
I notice a bulletin board filled with information regarding sickle cell anemia and blood transfusions. In that moment, I discover the food challenge shares the floor with blood transfusions.
Natalie smiled assuringly. "It's alright, ma'am. I'm on my way to Denver, but this storm is just terrible. I was wondering if you had any vacancies?"
In a large pot filled with water over high heat, bring to a boil and add 2 tbsp kosher salt. Add the purple potatoes and allow to boil for 45 min.
- Kiko - Full Coverage Concealer - 01 clear
LouisVuitton Monogram Canvas Neverfull MM
SIGH!!!
Mix till it's all combined. It shouldn't be dry so add a little more water if necessary. Remember, the softer your dough, the softer your bread. Now tip it onto the surface and knead till it's smooth and elastic, about 8-10 minutes.
The military preferred sabres and broadswords, with the Battle of Culloden in 1745 witnessing the bloody use and effectiveness of the Highland swordsman. Their skills were soon pressed into use by their erstwhile enemy, the British Crown, which they had served in many theatres including the American Colonies and soon against the armies of Napoleon.
I have four children.
As night man, Greg worked seven nights a week from midnight to 8:30 am, manning the desk and serving in the 24 hour bar. He was a big hit with the guests as he could talk about anything under the sun. He was a wonderful and attentive conversationalist. Often I would clean Greg’s hand print off the brass beer pump, smiling at this evidence of a night holding forth one hand on the pump the other gesticulating at all the other worlds beyond.
“Hey man,” Mitch says under his breath. “Want to head out of here soon?”
They used to work in a coal mine, not steady work
“Well, then,” he said, “we’re going to finish this together.”
A plane traveling from New York to Los Angeles on New Years Eve hits some unexpected turbulence. And then it hits some unexpected ground, leaving only a small handful of survivors. These survivors, after much panic and bickering, find that their night has gone from bad to worse as some wild animal is hunting them down and picking them off, one by one.
· November 13, 2011 12:00 AM
Central at McDowell METRO Light Rail Station
“Well, it’s 4:00, and the three of us are here, so I think we should go ahead and get started.”
So, all that leads me to now... the only way I know to step up my advocacy of PLC is to be proactive in raising awareness of what they are doing and the needs they have. And the only way I know to do that is to speak to groups of people about it.
Anyway, I’m kinda tired so I can’t guarantee this will be a long post – which is my way of avoiding writing “this will be a short post” and then making myself a liar by writing 1,500 words.
Pappa made sure of that. It was a tradition he wanted continued.
Over the course of the year A LOT has happened in my life and the blog has served as a journal and way to share myself with the world.
Over-worked postman.
10 – Prague O2 Arena, Prague Czech Republic (Pat O’Brien, guest guitarist)
Mothers are notorious for telling their children they can be — or do – anything they want in life. This is not, as I suspect some teenagers may believe, an attempt to blow sunshine up the dark orifices of an entire generation. Rather, it is a mother’s keen understanding of the true possibility and potential of her offspring. It’s our little way of saying, “Hey kid, make good choices and stay out of your own way, and you’ll go far in life.” We’re trying to inspire confidence, for God’s sake. You’re WELCOME.
"Pins."
In addition to all the above, loan amounts are based on the lesser of:
One of the things that did surprise me was how much of MR James’s material had been plundered by HP Lovecraft. I know Lovecraft admired James, he confessed as much in his essay on supernatural literature, but some of Lovecraft’s short stories have borrowed quite extensively from James tales like Lost Hearts and despite Lovecraft’s phenomenally fertile pantheon of horrors he is not the technician that James is when it comes down to atmosphere and plot.
They sit and talk, frolic a little, giggle a bit, drink a bit, and she sits on his lap. He whispers in her ear and she gasps and runs away!
Last night I was looking for answers about a lack of numbers and what I discovered was a world of support beyond anything I had imagined. WordPress bloggers are the most giving people of time and encouragement I have encountered in 41 years on this planet and I want to thank you all for really rallying behind me.
Oh, sweetheart. I’m so glad you clicked to here. Please come here and sit by my side and tell me your story. You see I’m an Aspie, too, so I get it. I get how hard it is to communicate with others. I get how frustrating it is to never really know if people are being sincere to you or not. I get how bad you want to scream because people won’t just say what they mean and mean what they say.
Title: Alone Chapter 1
Justice Henderson approved the injunction request in a 23-page decision issued on September 12. Despite this, the City has not started work because the site has been occupied by citizens of the Haundenosaunee (Six Nations) Confederacy. On Friday, the City agreed to begin discussions with the Confederacy about treaty rights and aboriginal burial sites in the valley.
Antje
Created a picture in her mind.
The force of contagion will spread this sentiment to other countries of the north and south, which hitherto had accepted South Africa as a leading country of the south, capable of using its eminent position resolutely to defend and advance the interests of Africa and the south.
A few generations before our own, journalism could still be viewed as an honourable trade, when reporter still viewed their roles as seekers of truth and exposers of wrong doing. There is now no honour left in their murky trade. The truth is now the very last thing they seek and facts are not exposed, they are spun to suit an agenda or to act as modern fables essential to the ongoing indoctrination.
Baby Jogger 87104CONSOL City Mini – Green-Gray w Parent Console For Sale
Ian Underwood – clarinet, flute, alto saxophone, tenor saxophone
1 tbsp whole allspice
Thus one who knows that he must work in Kṛṣṇa consciousness, who no longer desires to enjoy this material world, is actually learned. Everyone is working in the material world due to lust (kāma), but the wise man is free from the dictations of this lust (kāma-saṅkalpa-varjitāḥ). How is this possible? Jñānāgni-dagdha-karmāṇam: the fire of knowledge burns up all reactions of sinful activities. It is the most potent of purifiers. Our lives have meaning and direction only in so far as we strive to attain this transcendental knowledge of Kṛṣṇa consciousness, rāja-vidyā, which is the king of all knowledge.
The Hurst Baja Boot was envisioned by Vic Hickey who was regarded as one of General Motors top engineers of the time. GM had a “no racing” policy in place that initially stopped any plans of producing the Baja. But under the shadow of darkness, Hickey and Drino Miller completed the Baja Boot in 26 days at the Hurst facility in Michigan. The chassis was constructed out of SAE- 1010 13/4-inch steel tubing that weighed 3,450 pounds. The suspension system included parts from a Corvette rear drive assemblies and a Dana transfer case to support the 112 inch long hybrid four-wheel-drive buggy. The Baja Boot could operate from a Front wheel drive platform through an inverted drive assembly that allowed the driver to disengage the transfer case. Other Innovative features included a collapsible steering column, 11-inch Hurst-Airheart disc brakes, a 20-inch-diameter six-blade fan with reversed pitch, and a 350ci V-8 engine that was installed backwards.
Bee Pollen
Who Substitute UK
my arms around her as she sat snuggled up on my lap.
2TS. 2 Tango Sierra? I know that plane. (It was originally owned by a man named Tim Sullivan. You can do that, get a "vanity plate" but the whole point is that an ID is only ever used once so if a plane crashes you know what plane it is. There will never be another 2TS.)
The project, which seems to have begun as a kind of surcease from his commercial work—a way of recapturing some of the concerns and obsessions that had led him to New York and to art in the first place—soon became a substitute. It was all he did; given the number of images he left behind, he must have been out with his camera, hunting scenes and taking pictures, nearly every day until he died.Jerry Shore died at fifty-nine, in a 'well of alcohol and isolation.' He only sold one photo during his lifetime. Yet in those photos, and in their preservation by a collector, in their tender observation by a sensitive writer, his life is shown to be a complete success; an articulated, honest, loving vision.
No center?
They delivered the episode without the Diane snippet. And then on the day it was scheduled to air they said, “Oh, we needed to fix something, here’s the version we want you to air instead.” No one thought anything of it and so the first time NBC learned of this was when they saw it on the air. I’m not sure a show could get away with that today but it was sure fun at the time.
That title, of course, normally goes to Kevin Davies but the decline of the barrel-chested Bolton battler has been stark this season: having been the busiest fouler in seven of the past eight Premier League campaigns, fewer appearances this term meant that Davies trundled in at a career-low sixth in the rankings, his 58 offences looking puny in comparison to the 88 of joint-winners Grant Holt and Marouane Fellaini.
Here are the names we drew from:
White, who announced earlier that 2010 would be his last season as a professional bull rider, was admitted to a Denver hospital early Thursday morning for what turned out to be a case of appendicitis.
As usual, he's coming up with some great little quotes. A few of my favorites:
Yes, I am afraid that it is true, I am a bad Mom. Why, you ask? I put my two defenseless children in their bumbo's yesterday well before their time. The box says they should be good to go at 8 weeks. Well, my babies are a good two weeks past that time. I thought it would be fine. Clearly, it was not fine.
A Few things we have learned:
Did you make it to Private Vintage Club last week? What was your favourite look? Let me know by commenting below…
- on a t-shirt at the bus stop the day after I made this realization
There's a bunch of onsite activities to do during the day, and by the sounds of it they're pretty fun (I didn't go during the day so I wouldn't know). Starting around 5:00pm, different bands start to play at the two outdoor stages. Tonight's performances I saw included Mother Mother (admittedly, don't know them that much) and Kyprios. If you stay that late though, remember to bring a blanket or lawn chairs to sit on, and perhaps a jacket/blanket to cozy up in - it gets pretty cold around 8:00pm!
In my blog post back on April 11th, I wrote about the need for companies to develop a work ethic among Generation Y employees as part of my coverage of our webinar with Eric Chester. But as I was writing, I couldn’t help but think of several young adults I know who have a very strong work ethic. Is it fair to toss them in with the rest of Gen Y?
Someone brought in a review of A Chorus Line by Frank Rich, originally released to press in The New York Times October 1, 1983 and the day my grandmother passed away.
Getting back into the hunt felt a lot like being a pro wrestler that’s come out of retirement. I wonder if I’ve still got the strength and speed I need to land my moves. I ponder whether or not I’m still in decent enough shape for the camera. I wonder, most of all, if I can still sell myself as the bad ass that everyone needs to see, that everyone wants to be like. I wonder, if after all this time, anyone wants to hire me at all.
So for a bit of an experiment we added our Pilates and yoga onto the website along with Adele’s and Paula’s massage skills, and waited to see if there would be any takers.
( I may have mentioned this before...
Well hello there.
20. The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy - Douglas Adams
The Origins of Anti-Islamic Sentiment
After the discount, the cost would be £22.35 (GBP) or $63.75 (USD) (including postage)
21. Cruising For Burgers (9:19)
In Luton, England, the Muslims Against Crusades group protested against the parade of local regiment The Royal Anglians, or “The Poachers”, on their return from Iraq calling them “murderers”! English people ptotested but the police protected the Muslims.(2)
They also began to interpret the 1951 UN Convention on Refugees more “tolerantly” (prejudice) than other countries and altered the definition of a refugee from one persecuted by the state to anyone threatened by a group. Considering the terror attacks and the number of Muslim terrorists the judges have encouraged it is clear that White Britons are threatened by this group!
I believe the safest course would be to keep the weapon holstered and try some verbal shucking and jiving, and then elevate levels of force as necessary. I decided to look at it from a clinical first aid/emergency responder scenario. Perhaps along these lines,
Author : Yuechara15 ( @yuechara15 )
last night we were having dinner that included beets from our CSA crop share. i warned the boys that they should be careful not to get them on their clothes because they would stain.
“Harold, Harold, not Harold,” shouted the woman from the fruit stand
#1. The weekend before Christmas we celebrated with the Whites. We had dinner and opened gifts. I won’t even try and remember all that our (spoiled) kids got at the 4 Christmases, but I went shopping yesterday for a storage bin, and a new cube shelf with canvas totes because I know it’ll take some organizing when we get home. I’m also planning on packing away a few unopened toys that I might re-gift to Garrett on his birthday next year when they are more age appropriate. He’ll never know! I got that cool red canvas wagon for the park and the beach. It’ll carry food, drinks, towels, toys, and babies. I love it. And Paul became and NFL owner. His dad bought him stock in the Greenbay Packers. He is beyond thrilled. (click on collages to make them bigger.)
“Yes?” Bert questioned. He crossed his legs contently, appearing to have no intention of rising from his seated position on his friend’s trembling frame. “Well, best be out with it, before the tea wears off and I become grumpy. That will happen in about …”—he checked his watch—“half an hour, give or take a minute. As you know, I tend to take thing better after I’ve had a spot of tea.”
PKIXT Blog (pkixtblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Found this posted by a Facebook friend–World’s first invisible ad!
2 x 5/8 hole optics
My shoulder quit improving a few days ago, now it just hurts worse. Went to the specialist today and got it checked out. It seems I have a bad rotator. From what we could see, not only is the cartilage bruised, I have several muscles that have torn loose from the rotator cup and are flapping away in there. Bottom line is that in a couple of weeks I have to go into surgery and get them re-attached. Oh joy. Following that, several months of physical therapy and awesome pain levels. I guess my summer is pretty well shot in the ass as far as doing much physical stuff. Oh, well, you have to do what you have to do.
5/6. Bottle Warmer and Wipe Warmer
Set at medium heat and begin melting the sugar. The first few minutes might be painful because nothing seems to be happening but be patient!
What about other sequences, hip-openers, core, Hot Vinyasa?
I’m going to draw this to a close because I still have to review Game of Thrones (which I didn’t get to review last night cause I was seeing the Shins! I’ll take that trade cause they were amazing) and I have to watch a couple episodes of Bleach (to catch up with where I am in the manga). Plus, there’s a new episode of Glee tonight where they’re finally auditioning for NYADA. So, to put it lightly, I’ve got enough writing for the rest of the evening ot keep me busy. Even though it’s my day off, I spent my first two hours awake researching for a phone interview I did with British band Keane for work (should up on our website in a week or two) and then I spent an hour doing my write up of the Shins show. It seems like all I do is write these days. I don’t have a problem with that. Just observing how weirdly true it is. Anyways, when I get around to starting the next season of Community (which will be soon after it’s shocking ending in hte season finale), I’ll review that one on a disc-by-disc basis unlike this first season. Also, I just want everyone to know that if I was grading this season solely on the second half it would be an “A-”. So, if you start this series after my recommendation and don’t get what the big deal is immediately, give it some time and Community will really grow on you.
Finish: Chilham Station TR078536
Level 10: MP Cost: 30, Duration: 300 seconds, All Stats: +5%.
whether Directive 2006/24 precludes the application of a national provision based on Directive 2004/48, according to which an ISP may be ordered to give a copyright holder information on a subscriber in civil proceedings, thus facilitating the identification of a particular subscriber claimed to have committed an infringement;
Oh and it's my birthday on Saturday. I'll be expecting truckloads of presents, you guys. No biggie.
Late Night with David Letterman 10:35 pm – 11:35 pm
For this game, one child is chosen to be the wolf. The wolf stands about 10 feet away with his or her back to the rest of the children. The children call out in unison: “Mr./Ms. Wolf, what time is it?” The wolf returns the call with a response of 1 through 12 o’clock—turning around to face the other children as he or she does so.
Does it require a “mass audience” to make an impact? I think the answer to this depends on place, context, issue, content quality and other factors but I think that in some (or many?) cases of user generated content / participatory media / citizen journalism the fact is that it has an impact more than what one would associate with mere audience numbers. In other words, perhaps who is aware of CJ / reads it / bases their decisions on it is oftentimes more important than how many have access to and consume CJ?
that tears are endless.
I know that I am their Mother, but I personally think these babies are perfect.
Marty: "Doc, in English, please?"
Changing tack entirely we have Dial H #1 which is a relaunch of a DC concept that has been around since 1966 and which is possibly one of the most unusual and interesting comic’s I have ever read. The basic premise is that there is a mysterious phone booth somewhere in Littleville that allows the dialer to become one of a wide array of random and very weird superheroes for a short time if they dial the word H-E-R-O.
RND 5: *sc in first 2 st, dec over next 2 st*, repeat around (12 stitches)
Morrisey complained that immigration had led to the loss of our identity in November 2007: “ British identity has disappeared because the country has been “flooded” by immigrants. He suggested to music magazine NME that immigration was one of the reasons he would not move back to Britain from America .
All the papers from the KaiserCraft "secret bird society" pad just layered on covered 4 x 5 white cs and the verse here (my favorite bible verse) from Our Daily Bread designs.
Dr. Graham's. He had insisted
In 2007, Van Halen was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. The members inducted were David Lee Roth, Eddie Van Halen, Alex Van Halen, Michael Anthony, and Sammy Hagar. Tensions remained so high within the members and former members that only Hagar and Anthony showed up at the induction ceremony.
It's extraordinary to have such access to so many talented people... But in NYC, it's just the way it is... Creativity abounds here... The most talented people in the world walk the streets the same as everyone else... No matter how well known you are, in NYC, you walk to the same beat as everybody else... I love that there are so many Australians here contributing to the aesthetic vernacular... One such talent is Vanessa Holden (ex creative director at Real Simple, Editor of Martha Stewart mag and now top lady at West Elm) Vanessa, along with an entourage of talented Aussie photographers, stylists, designers, have all been contributing to the look and the feel of things over here... It's great to see our Australian creative point of view can contribute in such a significant way to the global aesthetic... And so, as I spend my days pounding the streets of NYC, I'm gathering inspiration and energy to bring home to Australia - and to infuse into our work at The Little Cottage (in country NSW!)...
Think about what this means. The most powerful country in the world is being governed according to the dreams of a Luo tribesman of the 1950s—a polygamist who abandoned his wives, drank himself into stupors, and bounced around on two iron legs (after his real legs had to be amputated because of a car crash caused by his drunk driving). This philandering, inebriated African socialist, who raged against the world for denying him the realization of his anti-colonial ambitions, is now setting the nation's agenda through the reincarnation of his dreams in his son. The son is the one who is making it happen, but the son is, as he candidly admits, only living out his father's dream. The invisible father provides the inspiration, and the son dutifully gets the job done. America today is being governed by a ghost.
When you come home and feel my heartbeat;
14These shall make war with the Lamb, and the Lamb shall overcome them: for he is Lord of lords, and King of kings: and they that are with him are called, and chosen, and faithful.
And what is so important about education that - supposedly - carrying it out incurs a get out clause in Article 5 of the Human Rights Act?
Bake until toothpick inserted in center of cake comes out clean, 45 to 50 minutes. Cool in pan 20 minutes, then turn out and place on serving platter (topping side up). Serve warm or at room temperature. (Cake can be stored in airtight container at room temperature up to 3 days.)
what a magnificent character
Source: www.itsmyascent.com
His attorney, Joan McPhee, issued a statement Tuesday evening describing the charges as misguided and that she is confident Mix will be exonerated.
Was invited down to the Wisma Atria boutique by Tocco Tenero’s lovely Brand Manager, Agnes to have a look at the awesome collection they have!
halfway between Ithaka and towering Samos
We also complained a lot about how all of us can change a flippin' diaper.
Divide the frosting into four bowls and color three of them yellow, red and green. We also left a very small amount in the fourth bowl white for mayonnaise, we are the mayonnaise family for sure. Plus you really need something on the bottom bun to hold the cupcake together and a thin layer of white frosting works perfectly.
Row 21: Knit the three stitches together.
Under Louis XIV, artists represented mythological scenes on them. Under Louis XV, they displayed graceful subjects, surrounded with rocaille ornamentation. Under Louis XVI, Venus and Cupid appeared, with their attributes. They were made, at this time, with Martin varnish, incrusted with gold and silver.
C) David already had a serious girlfriend and Rachel hadn't heard anything about them breaking up. Although, now that she thought of it, he didn't talk about her much. He didn't sound like a guy madly in love. Okay, Rachel. Don't dwell on that. He does love her. He's probably just the type who likes to keep his love life secret. But then again, in the beginning of their relationship, Cassandra's name popped up repeatedly in David's interviews. It was very annoying.
Still, the writer who was lamenting the pain of the job is a good one, whose end results are very satisfactory. It's the process that is agony, not the end product.
18 Reverberation Room (double sonnet that begins with the friendship between Liz and Jack on 30 Rock and ends up rhyming “obscene” with “feeling”)
Tyler-Ameen, Daoud. 2011. “Full Disclosure: Fugazi’s Best Live Moments, Remembered” NPR Music: The Record. Accessed March 22, 2012.http://www.npr.org/blogs/therecord/2011/12/01/143008732/full-disclosure-fugazis-best-live-moments-remembered
Disclosure: As noted above, Hunt's is a client. I wrote this post of my own volition on my own time.
But God had already set them aside as a nation and had chosen Paul to bear His name before the Gentiles.
Thursday I definately got my money's worth of hand clapping, foot stomping, and "Oh-o-o-owing". It was St. Patty's Day Eve and what better way to celebrate Irish drunkeness than to go a see a drunken Irish Band swilling Guiness. "Brilliant!" Flogging Molly is just fantastic good time fun! They can basically be summed up as only playing the Pogues fast songs.
When I had finished post-processing my photos and posted them, most of the people that had complained about me taking so long responded with something like, “I see what took so long, good thing you didn’t rush. These are some gorgeous shots!”
If you're looking for the short (and somewhat inaccurate) story: The EPUB format is the industry standard, and the file is sort of like a zipped up website. The book itself is written in the same code used to write web pages, and fancier books have extra files zipped into the final package.
As the afternoon wore on, they sat and talked about their families and dreams. The boy’s hand had slowly inched toward hers where it lay on the grass, and she had pretended not to notice. But Briana’s breath caught when he finally leaned across her to pluck a berry from her basket.
To be honest i didn't really enjoy this, I didn't think it was balanced, the caramel and fruit sweetness are spoiled by the butter overtones, and a hop bitterness smothered by the woody smoke that's not pleasant.
For those new to this site, here’s how it all works. For too long now blokes who look really seriously dodgy when they grow a Mo for Movember (Jeff Kennett, Shane Warne, Aunt Bunny, Ivan Milat, Hitler, Tom Selleck) have made it hard for the movement to gain credibility.
Of all the people to pick on …
This trail to the 1980s is not any blueprint, nor was it fully worked out for his age. It is there for us to work out for our age. This pamphlet has laid the ground for that task. When the capitalistic (private and state), exploitative, crisis-ridden imperialistic world of 1984 threatens to unloose a nuclear holocaust that would put an end to humanity as we have known it, it is clear that it is the urgency of the times which demands that this generation of revolutionaries turn to revolutionary praxis, to philosophy as action and action as philosophy.
Hi! I am Natalie from Endless Crafting and I am so delighted to be guest posting for Toni today. Toni is an amazing organizer and I just know we would be fast friends if we were neighbors! Thank you for this opportunity!
It that's the case, then the "2uV" sensitivity of the receiver is a bit moot.
The evening dinner was a bit awkward…the mansion and the schedule are both setup to accommodate regular Sims. I, on the other hand, do not consume plant and animal tissue for nutrition, I absorb sunlight and produce my own nutrition. In addition, my room contains a bed for sleeping, but no grow light. In fact, I am so used to living in a home with a grow light…
In Ecclesiastes 12 Solomon writes about the changes that come to those enduring old age. In today’s second verse he writes about an almond tree, which has blossoms progressing from white to dark pink. Blossoming in this case is an analogy of aging. Commentator Adam Clarke sees it this way in regard to aging: “The hair begins to change, first gray, then white; it having no longer that supply of nutritive juices which it once had.” He analogizes the changing color of the gray hair to the changing colors of the almond blossom as it ripens to maturity.
Staccato Du Mal - Embedded Reflection
THE RAVEN
MAJOR BATTLE WAS TRIGGERED IN JAPAN TO REMOVE THE CABAL
We're really not crazy, though. Using cloth wipes actually simplifies the whole cloth diapering process because you can just throw everything together in the diaper pail/wet bag and you don't have to sort out disposable wipes from the dirty diaper laundry. Cloth wipes are great to have around for other things too, like boogers or drool. Haha, the things you get used to cleaning up and talking about when you're a parent!
Ale Stars beer appreciation club/collective/gathering/tribe/mob at The Local Taphouse has been travelling along nicely now for just over two years.
time to turn on pandora radio station, The Supremes...my work music
Per serving: 108 cal., 3 g fat, no fiber info given, about 2 WW pts
Where words fail, hate speaks - Hocico
I have many friends I mix with on a regular basis who are fans of ‘country pursuits’. Country pursuits usually consist of the flushing, pursuing (hence the name pursuits) and the dispatching of wildlife in its various forms. I have been doing much of this since I was a wee lad with a dog and a blunt instrument, I graduated to firearms and have even had access to heavy artillery but I rarely used that on wildlife.
April 26 to May 3 2008 Alogon Gallery, hours: Sundays 1-4pm
MacBain is quoted as saying, “I was the one on the right track, and you were the ones that were going to burn in hell, and I’m happy to say as I stand before you right now, I’m going to burn with you.“
When we first begin to use the phrase, we’re almost like little children with a new toy, we dabble with the thought all day long, completely love it. Its so wonderful that we accept the abundance without question… then comes phase II… when we begin to use GRATITUDE with a NEED for proof… and this happens when we begin to CONSCIOUSLY and conditionally begin to use the phrase to seek SPECIFIC results… this is when Gratitude becomes conditional and less effective for our awareness is in the PROOF not in the KNOWING!!
I pondered on it waaay to heavily for a day or so.
Today things are just floating down the river aimlessly and where we end up, no one knows.
Achilles was revived and flown to Starship Hospital. Sukhraj was not.
And so much much more!!!!
Learning about the past through the study of history is crucial if we want to understand our modern society and the issues that confront us. While Classical Greco-Roman history is fascinating on the whole, the most interesting aspect from my point of view is the slow decline and ‘transformation’ of the Roman empire into a series of European and Middle Eastern states, based around new religions, that still dominant our culture and society today. No one has had more influence in this field or written with as much erudition as Peter Brown. His award is well-deserved, and will hopefully help to raise awareness about the important events of the past in order to better understand our place in the present.
One thing that gets to me is that sometimes Livi behaves better for her dad than me. We might have had a rough day, but as soon as my husband comes home, she is like a new child. I usually let him know how things are going by sending emails and pictures and I tell him when we are having a rough day. So when he gets home and she is all smiles and hugs, he just looks at me like I imagine things. And boy, does he ever gloat when I tell him that she changed the minute he walked through the door.
That feeling of being back out running, is kind of like seeing your old friend you haven’t in a while.
On another note, I’ve been reading SOOO much H. P. Lovecraft. It really satisfies my craving for short intriguing horror stories, but I now spend most evenings being extremely nervous for no reason, and trying not to look out the windows when it’s dark in case I see something terrifying. Like Cthulhu.
9:14 PM – Johnny Ace announces that CM Punk will take on Lord Tensai tonight. Punk does love a challenge.
"I once had a sweet little doll, dears, The prettiest doll in the world; Her cheeks were so red and white, dears, And her hair was so charmingly curled. But I lost my poor little doll, dears, As I played in the heath one day; And I cried for her more than a week, dears, But I never could find where she lay."
Why did I wait to say it until now?
I wanted it to look as similar to our lounge as possible so removed the check pattern from the recliner and coloured it as close as possible to the colour of our recliners...ours are a bit more on the green side but I couldn't quite match it with the Copics. Then I made a skirting board and floorboards and coloured the wall as close to our wall colour as I could manage. Overall, I'm pretty happy with the result!!
I know I said that my blog was going to be moving to my own domain. Umm just kidding? Actually, Kelli, the tireless servant who will be creating my website, emailed me at 3:oo in the morning to let me know that the transfer was complete. Unfortunately, Blogger wasn't redirecting people to my domain, so Kelli transferred it back. Sooo, I believe at this point, you can access my blog at mom2my6pack.blogspot.com, or dawnmeehan.com, or mom2my6pack.com, or becauseisaidso.com. Take your pick. I will have a website of my own soon (and it will be way cooler than I am!), but for now, it's the same ole blog.
The see through trend has been going on for quite some time now. I love this trend however, just a bit of advice. If you are going to buy something see through, please understand that not everyone wants to know whether or not you shop at Victoria’s Secret!
I looked at the first page. And then the second. And then I saw my formatted dedication, and I cried. Actually cried. Seriously, people, I’m not a crier. That would be my sister. But there it was, a sliver of my heart on the page, EXACTLY AS THE WORLD WAS GOING TO SEE IT. Subtly, the whole world shifted.
Despite all that, there were some areas that seemed lacking for me. There was less humour, less emotion, less romance between Cat and Bones, and so on. The key word here is "less"; it's not gone completely, but it's almost like Frost has taken a step back. The emotional depth that was so strong in previous books where I felt like I could cry is kind of shallow in this book. I guess that could be because with such a deadline of only a few weeks to try and find a way to stop him, to find his accomplice who's going to grab the targets for him, find out who the targets are to keep them safe, and live when Kramer is throwing things at you at every opportunity, all before 31st October, there's little time to waste on emotion, you've just got to push it aside and do.
my eyelashes broken ,
"Mama, it's candy. Open it."
Given Ann’s escape attempts, Charlie knows she has to be mentally astute and drug-free to choose a life with him. Once Ann is no longer under sedation, life is blissful, until they discover her husband is still alive.
Oh jeez... were we talking about a birthday?
It's really cool this book, SHED by Julie Morgenstern which is consuming me right now. But it it has made me evaluate who I thought I was or who I was trying to please when I bought certain things or got involved with certain interests. However, I can safely say that when I bought this dress from an op shop a few years back, as dated as the style is (and it was out of fashion even when I bought it), I knew that it would let me feel happy and carefree when I wear it, which is good enough for me, even if it does not please any fashionistas out there.
When we are firmly rooted, built up, established in the faith, we can then over-flow with gratitude. (Colossians 2:7) When our hearts are pouring out with gratitude, we exude happiness and peace in whatever situation we are currently facing. Others are drawn to our peacefulness. They want to know about our secret to a contented life. It’s not about me, but, all about God’s Glory. We don’t need to argue or dispute our faith with anyone. This great News is certainly not a secret. When we outwardly show the light coming from within, we show others that our faith-packed lifestyle has rescued us from darkness and delivered us into God’s kingdom (Colossians 1:13). We are still being changed into His image (2 Corinthians 3:18) but we are always Victorious (1 John 5:4) and we will always be Alive with Christ (Ephesians 2:5).
the closer I feel to old friends as I write my Christmas cards......
Wish you were here.
8. Church does not require expensive clothes.
For example, I asked, “Where do you think the guitar came from?” Someone answered Spain – I replied that Spain was close, but the country I was thinking of is south of Spain. They gave me some good guesses until Africa was finally guessed.
910 ***D-X/10/1985. “Article I, Section 7 of the Constitution of 1787.” Gannett Lecture Series, Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(6), above, and in Item B-4, above, pp. 39-49, 309-10 (1989).)
Hey Readers! You’ll like this — L.
as humid warmth fills the hall.
Conan O'Brien's social media experience illustrates one of the most successful uses of social marketing by a celebrity in connecting with their audience.
I foresee many cards in the future starring the Heep family Valentine camel.
Joe: Not enough can be said about the importance of staying well within the manufacturer’s weight limitations. Personally, I’d feel better knowing my tow vehicle was rated to handle 10% more weight than I was towing. Choose and equip your tow vehicle so it is more than adequate to do the job. Most manufacturers offer an optional towing package. It costs less to order the package than to add the equipment after you take delivery. When it comes to choosing between adequate power and fuel economy, I would take the power. I’ve never seen an RVer drive to the top of a long, steep grade, get out and curse his rig for having too much power. Before you buy your RV package be sure the manufacturers of the tow vehicle, trailer and hitch all agree you have a towing combination that is made for each other. Do your homework, pay attention to the manufacturer’s written recommendations and be sure the tow vehicle you choose will take you where you want to go and let you do the things you want to do.
INORI GIVES HIM HER VOID IN YET ANOTHER GODDAMN SEX SCENE
An excerpt from the blog, ” Sustainably Creative” by Michael Nobbs.
Or your finger..lol
Guys, I just want to thank you so much for bearing with me through the month of November. I ended up being way more into my novel then I originally thought, so my poor little blog got left in the dust.
"The great-grandfather from Friso’s mother’s side, a German prince named Hendrik, raped his own daughter, the mother of queen Beatrix, as a result of which a daughter was born. The father of Friso, Claus, was a homosexual who also used children for sexual pleasure. The lawyer of the Queen and main guardian of the crown prince, Friso’s brother, was a sadistic pedophile against whom even testimony of child executions exists."
Health officials say the disease tends to return in three-to-five-year cycles.
It's that time again... I absolutely LOVE this time of year, not just in the fact that being a Christian, our Savior and Lord was born, but also because I love the whole spirit of giving everyone is in, and just the lights, and the family, and friends. Like many people, this past week I put up our tree... having two little ones 18 months apart and the oldest turning 2 this week, my hubby and I felt it was in their best interest to not have a big tree that they could get hurt with, but three smaller trees...
-the extra long version of the classic. -Just relax into it, clear your mind, and enjoy the feeling of being close to someone who thinks you’re pretty cool.
I made a fridge magnet with two of Fawn Palmer's images , Chi Truth and Chi Joy . Just working with these, absolutely versatile!!
Pru in the Comfy Cone (kind of looks like a pirate):
As an example take a preliminary finding from Robert Plomin's group. Docherty et. al. (2010) defined a SNP score associated with mathematical ability and , although not confirmed by a second study, they (Docherty 2011) evaluated the effect of an interaction of the SNP score with a measurement of "teacher negative" on a mathematics achievement (measured in SDs below):
PSALM 22:23
Carradine
Several houses away, an unmarked cruiser sat in a dark spot between two streetlights about eight houses apart. The man behind the wheel with the shaved head and Kevlar vest snug around his torso was reading about World War II but put the book down when he saw the snow. He watched as scattered flakes hit the windshield and slid down to rest on the wipers before they were blown away by the increasing wind. He returned to his book for a second and then back to the snow with a squint, leaning forward for a closer look at the whitish spots on the other side of the glass.
I believe that it was an amazing architectural marvel, even that it must have been a peaceful place to inhabit. But some of the history I am skeptical of. For instance that there were so many temples. The Incas seem to be engineering geniuses but are also likely to be practical. Perhaps some of the supposed temples were observatories, look outs, or maybe even lecture halls. According to our tour guide, Machu Picchu may have been a university of sorts to teach other Incas their craft and way of life.
Roasted Sweet Potato and Green Bean Salad
Tim and his crew have been really open to museums process for developing and implementing a design. They have not swooped in to take it over as if it were a studio set. They have really been respectful of and helpful in recognizing the differences. It’s been a good collaboration.
I can stop the PregVit 5 and just go on the regular PregVit. There was some discrepancy in the timeline calculations. For some reason TCART said I'm due on August 25th, which is funny since they did the ultrasounds that put me at a due date of August 21st. Andrighetti calculated Augst 20th. We'll see what the IPS puts me at on Tuesday, but I'm pretty sure that I'm 11 weeks, 3 days now although Boh was measuring a day ahead on the 2nd and 3rd u/s I had.
Not bad. I know my work is changing and I put a lot of time and detail into the work I do. So I'm still happy even though not as many photos got scrapped. I should mention that I do have about 10 layouts, several 2 pagers, that I didn't count because they are laying in my "need finishing" pile. This year, I'm going to keep a running tally again...I think it helps to keep me motivated.
In such an environment, only a few factors serve to mark who is, and is not, worth listening to. One of these is humor. If you are funny, you win arguments. Make the masses laugh—and especially if you can make them laugh at authority, or tradition, or anything that smacks of control—and you win the mob’s affection. Another factor is popularity. In a mob rule, celebrities are politicians—become famous and your opinion will have validity. And a final factor, interestingly, is grammar, the ultimate leveler of ideas. Because if I can find a spelling error in your thoughts, I can dismiss your opinion regardless of its content.
I look forward to all of the incredible mistakes I may make in the next couple years, because this is when I will be more easily forgiven.
~Mia Hamm
If you are terrified of mashed potatoes because of the carbs (GASP!) and the butter (DOUBLE GASP!) then have no fear my friends...I have found a pretty darn good alternative.
The golden chips were the work of artist Stefan Bohnenberger. Mr Bohnenberger argued that both his Golden chips and the more biodegradable template were works of art and that he was entitled to compensation from the gallery for the loss.
I also spent a little money to replace our laundry hamper. This thing had 2-3 tears in it, and was being held together with zip ties. I will hand it to my hubby for the creativity of helping the hamper last as long as it did, but i am so happy to replace it with a $10 one from Target that matches our room and style a bit better. I'm not really counting this as spending money, because lets face it, we were going to have to replace it anyways, well see for your self.
kind of peaceful & nice.
I mean, telling a complete fairy tale in a haiku seems hard enough let alone in six words?
This April they were informed that council wants to ‘reinspect’ their property. Ensuing communication revealed that Council is unwilling to disclose what they are looking for. Therefore, Becker and Shaw responded that they see no point in yet another inspection since nothing of significance has changed since the last inspections–by various levels of government: Regional District of Nanaimo Bylaw Enforcement, the Vancouver Island Health Authority, the Ministry of Environment and the Ministry of Agriculture.
The tapes were mixed and then stored away. I even made covers for them. They lay forgotten for years gathering dust.
These and other beliefs formed part of a credo that, rightly or wrongly, shaped the 20th century for many of us. Where this credo was not intoned, there was little or no innovation and investment was stultified.
These are my NEW project's, fabric collections to make any thing I can think of, Kits, you name it.
Hoping to surprise him, you quietly make your way to the bedroom, a mischievous grin playing at the corners of your mouth as you approach the closed door.
Brandy (You’re a Fine Girl) – Looking Glass
- A Child has to perform to get the approval and love of the father. If you make a mistake in your life, in your steps or works in what you do, you are treated like a dump. (Always remember God love us unconditionally, it’s not based on what we do or not do).
Then she will be happy, forever and always.
This is particularly galling when even our neighbouring countries allow their overseas citizens to vote in the country that they are residing in. Yes, my dear Malaysians, our Singaporean, Filipino, Indonesian and Thai friends allow their overseas brethren to cast their votes abroad.
NIC CAGE: HEY!
It’s really simple…. It really is.
“When Sunny Gets Blue”
The hurt and disgust you forced me to sallow each day
It was nice to see the sun today too. A little cold, but sure was nice. I think all last week, it was dreary days and I don't do well on dreary days!!! Only 2 more months to go. The sun is setting at 5:35 today, so everyday it will be getting later and later. YYYYAAAHHHH!!!!!
I remember using this body lotion a few years ago but they stopped selling it in here. I recently saw it back in the store and I just had to pick one up for myself and my mom as well. Let's hope they still have it when I run off it. If you love sweet scents, I highly recommend that you check this one out :)
- talvihorros - descent into delta - hibernate - 2011
After two weeks of traveling, visiting ag companies and networking with incredible people, I can tell you that IBIP was the experience of a lifetime. The program enhanced my academic development through interactions in a foreign environment with an array of professionals from unique agriculture sectors. And definition of agriculture is not limited to farming. We visited diverse farms, production facilities, corporate offices, NGOs, retailers and restaurants–all directly related to agriculture.
8. I almost never recall her buying clothes, except for 3 long dresses for parties that she bought in one outing in the mid-1970s. I don’t know what prompted that splurge.
Perhaps Wodehouse has an appeal nowadays for just that reason – after all many find it easy to say they love a friend, but to those they are intimate with, well so often love is the taboo word. Whether this means that nowadays intimacy occurs for reason other than (or opposite to) love I know not. But that taboo quality of the word (shhh) Love, sure makes me wonder.
You can read (and see more photos!) about that and other wonderful, little things for which I am grateful here.
This was a law promulgated by Henry IV of France in 1598, granting religious liberty and full civil rights to the Protestant Huguenots, but the revocation of the edict by Henry’s grandson, Louis XIV, in October 1685, brought an end to that freedom, declaring Protestantism illegal in terms of a new law. The persecution that ensued was nothing short of horrendous, and as the penalty often included burning at the stake, it was small wonder that the Huguenots were eager to take advantage of the invitation to emigrate to the Cape of Good Hope. - Le Cap de Bonne-Espérance. - The name alone must have spelled hope to them.
They accuse its leader, the Russian MP Maxim Mishchenko, of having ties to Russky Obraz and providing protection for those who preach hate and violence against migrants in Russia.
In action: She spent an hour picking out her dress and two hours in front of the mirror, and when it was time for the date, she was ready to make the boy swallow his tongue.
Castor Bean
I pray that all my readers, no matter what your individual beliefs, will be blessed in this “lusty” month with the magic of a happy and fulfilling sex life. Blessed Be!
8. Write poetry.
And now for a few words from the HIGHEST paid television actor in the world…
This is for the NaPoWriMo prompt of using anaphora: the phrase “I remember”, three times within the piece. I just kind of rolled with it and thought of my grandmother… a bit pensive tonight. Twenty minutes to go, and then I can be… more pensive? Less pensive? We’ll see.
Monet’s beautiful blue or purple painting of a lily pond was one of the highlights for me when visiting the Musee d’Orsay in Paris. The vivid colours are mesmerising – one could stand an stare at it for hours.
they want, that we could offer
Edition- 1/31 1pm- I see some of the comments that have been left so far ask about my gall bladder. Yes, that is long gone 6 years ago and the pain and discomfort is the left side not the right side where your gall bladder would be.....
But her silence in allowing the Obama Administration to “throw down another barrier” in front of Veterans is deafening.
Here are some of the repeated criticisms I’ve heard, followed by my rebuttals (which you are free to use, if you haven’t already):
At first it seems that the Sunderban is all water. The rivers become so wide here that the other bank is not visible. Then suddenly you spot an island.And you see dense green. Green so dark that it immediately soothes you eyes. The vegetation here is mostly mangrove, with sundari trees dominating. Their roots jut out from the soil like knives. I have been told that walking among them is difficult and requires tremendous care. The branches of the trees stoop down to touch the water surface and sways gently when the wind blows. Here and there an uncommon bird is spotted and the quietness of the jungles are sometimes broken by the serenading of birds. But the calm scenery is just a façade. For the Sunderbans is the home to the famous Royal Bengal tigers- one of the fiercest creatures on this planet. Their ferocity comes partly from the harsh conditions they live in. Why is it so harsh?
We started with a red hoodie and pants, and I built the whole costume on the hoodie.I posted some sneak peeks here.
It's fresh hop season once again. Falling Rock will host this event on October 16th from noon-five with a $20 admission for 4 tokens, each trades for a beer. That averages to $5/beer.
Who would fight Goliath? Dave.
Above, it isn’t bright.
Let me explain since I know there must be some confusion.
“I know. Let’s make this hole bigger. And then we can hang down from the roof. You hold me. I will get someone to get our butts out of this mess.”
You won’t like it if:
Otley Brewery - I'm not allowed to describe them as the Welsh version of a Scottish brewery, and to be fair that wouldn't do them justice. They think in terms of beer evolution, as opposed to beer revolution. I've just taken out Erdinger in favour of their O7 Weissbier on the kegs, and I'm deadly serious about putting their CreosO on instead of a Copenhagen beer if they ever keg it. The best thing about these guys is they really do let the beer do the talking.
Aziz has already gone some way with his imagination and, after seeing they have water, persuades another waiter to attend to the rest of their needs. His reason?
All in all, a good couple of weeks have just past by - here's hoping to better times ahead!
There was a woman at the counter, and from the look of her, you could tell she was no fair weather friend to the lottery. On the contrary, she appeared to have had a long love affair with playing the numbers. As I patiently waited my turn, glancing at my watch, she played the Pick 3, the Pick 4, the Cash 5 and the Mega Millions. She was playing numbers boxed and squared and speaking to the man behind the counter in a lottery-dialect which the rest of us could not begin to comprehend. I glanced at the sheaf of papers in her hand and began to worry that she might be standing at the counter for another hour.
It'll Chew You Up and Spit You Out by Concrete Blonde
This morning we got a call. Bad news. No heartbeat. Time warp back to September 2009 - the worst thing a mom can hear. No heartbeat.
“In the earth God has assigned kings, princes with other governors under them, all in good and necessary order. The water above is kept and raineth down in due time and season. The sun, moon, stars, rainbow, thunder, lightening, clouds, and all birds of the air do keep their order.” (Ibid, p. 88. The Homily of Obedience written in 1547)
I have a love/hate relationship with Christmas music. What I like, I *really* like. But there's so much atrocious schlock that I just despise. For every "Hark the Herald Angels Sing" or "Chestnuts Roasting on an Open Fire", there's "Feliz Navidad", "Rocking around the Christmas Tree", etc., etc.
John smoked cigarettes, and Mason and I made fun of him, and he stopped smoking immediately. We got to know him, and as we’ve got to know him, he became one of our parents, for sure, and he has been a huge influence on me and my brother. I think that’s really the main thing I have to say.
Kevin Spacey is wonderful playing the serial killer. He is extremely creepy and very believable.
As PAIR volunteers, college students have the opportunity to make a true impact in our own city for up to four years, a chance that is truly once-in-a-lifetime. I have personally seen my very first refugee students, sixth-graders at the time, grow and change into confident, young adults about to go on to high school. It has been a great privilege to play a role in mentoring them at a crucial time in their lives. Through the relationships with my students, I have learned so much: what hope in the face of adversity looks like, how to listen to teenage woes, and, most importantly, the value of having long-term dedication to those I care to serve.
it cracked and creaked and began to slide up.
Child of my heart
Here's a birthday card I've made for a friend. Hope she like's pink and blue.
3/4 cup sweet white rice flour
Bringing in produce from overseas is not, of course, a novelty for local growers. "We are already a net importer of fruit and vegetables," said federal independent MP Bob Katter today. And while the present deep cuts to prices for these consumables reflect recent good harvests, due to the La Nina effect that has delivered strong rainfalls in Australia, you wonder what will happen when the situation changes. Will Coles and Woolworths lift their prices or will they continue to look overseas for cheaper alternatives?
But unlike the sentiment expressed in the famous poem on the Statue of Liberty, the huddled masses who immigrated to Boston did not receive an overwhelming welcome.
Does that happen to you? Maybe its just me, my tolerance for boredom and ennui has gotten so ingrained that the minute stuff starts happening, I go all blooey?
I only had to look at the columns of the miniature movie posters emblazoned at the back to convince me that this might just work. They were just the right size for the job. The right width, and adjustable length (depending where I’d cut). Using the cover’s spine also kind of works too.
“I can’t do this dad…I can’t go through with this” I cried
31. Boys don’t care if their noses aren’t perfect.
Hunt's, a client, recently brought me out to Denver for the launch of their new dinner sauce line. Just as the sauces are designed to elevate an ordinary dinner to something beyond, the team went beyond, introducing a group of Colorado bloggers to the sauces at Mise en Place cooking school.
Premiere Vision, a huge Textiles event in the fashion calender, was nothing like I had expected it to be. It was very secretive, and many exhibitors present had closed stalls and even bouncers at the entrances! Being a university student, most exhibitors were apprehensive and refused to speak to us but some were very happy to speak about their work. Indigo, another part of the show, was more appealing to me as it allowed you to look through samples and design boards as well as speak to the designers there. I even got a few contacts and possible future work placements too! After a long day on our feet, we relaxed for a while before heading out again to Saint Paul's and exploring the area's boutiques. We found a little restaurant called Okawa which served amazing food and had a lovely atmosphere to it.
This week the Featured Stamper is JovialJudi - congratulations to Judi and enjoy your special week!! I had a look through her gallery but decided on her latest upload Prairie Fairy Flowers to case. I kept the flower theme and the punched border, changing the image and colours.
The trust word became a moment for me to laugh/chortle as I have had parents in conference tell me how much they trust their child and would let said child babysit the younger children in the family while I was hard pressed to find an appropriate way to state I would not trust the same child to complete a supervised science lab involving matches. Trust is a perception and it is a perception inherently built on ‘belief’ and the self-reflective quality of a parent having done a great job raising their child.
Just a mini-post about Assembly this time! I don't have much to tell you about that, I think you're not so interested in some geeky stuff :--D And I must say that I didn't sleep very well during the event, so I don't even remember many things haha...
Searching for a truth,
2. Offering money to my friends to do entertaining things,
After Domaine Huet, we made our way to Les Caves de Loires, a collective of several vineyards in the area. 90% of their wine is sparkling and almost all of it is from the Chenin Blanc grape. And before I move on to share what I really thought, my friend, Laura, tells me that I must share the one factoid she remembers that there is a guy who works there who turns 42,000 bottles of champagne a day. Laura and Jen now believe this to be my career calling.
Knobe makes the issue more personal by giving the example of a fundamentalist preacher who has devoted himself to a crusade against homosexuality, taking the common position among fundamentalist Christians that gay sex is a sin and the “gay lifestyle” is against God’s commandments. The wrinkle is that this particular preacher is himself gay and has fought against his sexual inclinations his entire life. Thus, for one man the ancient doctrine of “know thyself,” says Knobe, reaches a fork in the road. If the true self is rational, this man is obeying his true self by living according to higher values — his Christianity — instead of giving in to animal drives. (The preacher, who admits that he sometimes loathes his attraction to other men, takes this self-hatred as a good sign, since it is in accord with God’s own attitudes).
1, Paint your Easter egg mould using a pastry brush with the melted chocolate making sure you cover any gaps and pop in the freezer for 2-5 minutes
” You have come to see the lights too! We haven’t seen them yet. Oh, look! “
Our advice to the press: Don’t seek professional safety through the even-handed, unfiltered presentation of opposing views. Which politician is telling the truth? Who is taking hostages, at what risks and to what ends?
Rule Three: Just because my specific market doesn’t exist doesn’t make it unmarketable. It only means I will make it marketable.
In our Quick Start example, we will create a system where we can turn on or off four Arduino digital output pins from D4~D7. (If you are unsure about how to program an Arduino, please consider this short series of tutorials). The BtB is connected using the Bees shield. This is based on the demonstration sketch made available on the BtB Wiki page - we will use commands from the terminal on the Android device to control the Arduino board, which will then return back status.
I'M ALMOST DONE WEEK.
The ceremony was so beautiful that I was moved to tears – this is a very rare occurence – as I NEVER cry! It was the combination of observing the vows of a couple who are clearly so in love, the song they chose to walk down the aisle to (Adele), the wonderful weather and a lovely, supportive group of friends and family in attendance.
Virginia Tech
And then the professor mentions to the class that MLK, Jr. had numerous affairs. I was aghast and personally affronted. As a woman I lost some respect for the man. There he is preaching love your enemy, truth, justice and equality for all and yet he was cheating on his wife? And he was a pastor!!!
After over five decades of flirtation with Rome, from serious series (I, Claudius and The Caesars) to populist pop-ins (Doctor Who), Western TV has Spartacus, a shameless celebration of strength, beauty and iron determination in a brutal world. Japan has also contributed to the sword-and-sandal genre. But instead of reflecting the modern age in the brutality of the arena, Thermae Romae reveals the empires of Rome and Japan through spa architecture. The brotherhood of the baths replaces the brotherhood of blood and sand.
But, sometimes the circles look like triangles and the functions don’t make sense.
I plan on attending the Phoenix Comic-Con with my new pal, where I'll try my luck talking to William Shatner and Caspar Van Dien, as well as anyone else. If anyone reading the blog's in the area, I'll probably be fairly easy to spot, in that while I'm sure there'll be lots of big bearded bespectacled beponytailed chaps there, I'm fairly confident that I'll be one of the few to be speaking with a Scottish accent.
Ok so last pic lol sorry if im boring u this is a box my sister made she is 16 and this is her 1st easel box card she made fro her friend's birthday I think she did really good and it came out really well she put a lil bracelet inside the drawer which her other friend made and her friend was so delighted with it.
Being in a basement, it wasn't light and airy like dojos I've seen. The boxers had one side of the room; the other was taken up by a kickboxing class--again, all men.
Then Thursday passed. I wrote an uplifting blog post about going out on my own on Saturday night. I didn’t hear back from him.
2tbsp honey
It’s not slowing her down. She loves to go for walks! Crossroads Hospital staff adore this girl!
In 2009 Rob Parissi was involved with members of 70's group LAW in recording a song for Ohio State University called 'GO BUCKS. It was released in August that year.
Our drunken dads began cackling like sailors. Zub's pop produced some tools, and our two heroes quickly removed the steering wheel from Unkgee's van. The journey home was rough, but every time things looked down, we pulled out that wheel and had ourselves a chuckle.
Cover:
Yola
1. The boss is also human.
So i've been eye'ing this line for a few months now - and well - i HAVE to have a few peices for this summer! - decisions, decisions! .. well i'm also waiting for some coupon codes to use, as well! - i'm SO not a "pay retail" kinda' gal .. i'm all about sample sales, coupon codes, sales, discount stores, or eBay ! ! ! .. sure if i had a million bucks, then it wouldn't be an issue paying retail (even tho, i still think i'd go for the sale, it's the "hunt" i think that i get the thrill from) .. ANYONE feel me on the sale stuff?!?!
News10/KXTV
Most of us ended up in McDonalds which was overrun by freshers and chavs. Classy lassies!
Analysts like Trevor Sikorski at Barclays Capital have said the bill should be far less — about €300 million, with non-European airlines paying about €75 million of that.
Henry's Red friend is living at Grandpa & Grandma Fisher's house and his Blue friend is at Uncle Dylan's house... thank you to my wonderful family for agreeing to give Henry's friends such a good home!!
The website prevents copying images, so I have to use links. And FYI, the image the link brings you to is usually a guy in a guy-shaped t-shirt, but I'd have it printed on a more fitted women's t-shirt.
The object of this exercise, as many of my fellow writers might know, is to make the usual flat, one-sentence rejection (Thank you for your submission but it isn’t what we’re looking for) less devastating, less whimper-inducing. Preparation is nine-tenths of the battle, I say to myself.
who had the most as we weren't given the
- More gianduja mousse
You talk like Marlene Dietrich
I hope people will stay in touch as I'd love nothing better than to see them succeed and know I had a small part to play in their journey.
First...
( Ten Little Indians)
My teamies have beribboned, buttoned and bowed up some fabulously gorgeous cards... head on over to Send A Smile 4 Kids Challenge to oooh and aaaah over them, then get to crafting and share your kid-friendly cards with us for a chance at those super prizes. Even better, follow the guidelines here and make a couple to send some cheer to a girl or boy of any age who's stuck in hospital on these gorgeous spring days! (And even if it's raining and the world is waterlogged, who wants to be stuck indoors at a hospital?)
… The only Douglas Adams book I ever actually read was a Dirk Gently novel I read in 1987ish, not that I remember books I read in the 80s the way I remember movies watched in the 80s.
You can talk about every restaurant experience you’ve ever had. You can re-make every Paula Deen/ Julia Child recipe. Sh*t, you can start a blog about remaking every single Julia Child recipe and then sell the thing as a feckin’ movie! And then retire to France!!!! She-sus Christ, I want to step in a pile of golden shrimp poo like that!
I dare not think of my own struggles
Spidey webs MJ and pulls her out from under a toppling brontosaurus, then gives her a firm tongue-lashing for putting herself in danger. It's Spidey's hope that the gruff treatment would throw her off any trail that Spidey might be Peter Parker, and it does. Dr. Connors arrives to talk some sense into Stegron, Steggy calls a pterodactyl and makes a break for it, and Spider-Man follows. Over the ocean, Spidey slugs Stegron, who falls off his mount and into the drink. The Dinosaur Man sinks to the bottom, not to be seen again until a Lizard two-parter in the pages of The Amazing Spider-Man a few years later.
Dawn provided no end of comfort to me in showing me that overcoming the repressed past and integrating the”dark” side of me as part of my “whole”, is all part of my spiritual journey, and part of learning and growing. She helped me to see that in ringing her and reaching out, I’d let some of the pain out and have shown that I am ready to deal with the pain, to learn and move on.
15. What A Friend We Have In Jesus
It was lovely!
Unlike the previous day this was supposed to be a tight schedule day. The original plan, as I later found out, was to be dropped into the field today. A bit ambitious, but possible, weather permitting.
PS-My sweet friend Seldon emailed me to let me know Piperlime is having a 15% off sale that ends today- enter code XOXO. Pretty sweet Valentine's Day treat!!
Their processors silent, their publishing done
Arkanoid
Cut 150 4" squares of batting. I'd recommend using warm and natural or warm and white batting. Or both. :) This is a great way to use up batting scraps! I would NOT recommend using any batting that is medium or high loft. It will be a wrestling match. Alternatively, you could use flannel in place of batting (I haven't tried it) OR you could simply use flannel for both layers and omit the batting altogether. (I haven't tried this, either.)
Step into Their World:
- I love how she frantically waves her arms to splash in the bathtub.
But in religion, diversity and unity are really beautiful words. If God had wanted a single-one-type utopia He would have made everyone alike. but He didn't. He didn't even make His Angels the same, what more Djinn or Mankind with our varying passions, wisdom and foolishness? I think that this reflects the Unity through Diversity or Plurality... a reflection of the infinite multi-faceted attributes of God. After all, even God has many names and attributes, although a couple are clearly His favourites - Most Compassionate and Most Merciful, ar-Rahman and ar-Rahim.
I just hope that however bright and blinding the veneer of fiction that covers this fabulous story, you will still be able to see through it to the historical reality that lies behind.
Look, I love Scratch Acid. I saw Scratch Acid and they were fucking fabulous. Not to take anything away from Rey Washam, who's just a supreme fucking drummer. But what Orestes is doing on the verse, he's basically playing an entirely separate line that's not really connected. He's not in 3/4, he's not playing with us, and when he comes back with us he starts playing in a different time signature against us. I don't think Rey really did shit like that. Rey had a different kind of attack and a different way of going about it.
It felt SO GOOD to stretch today. It made me realize that I haven’t done enough of that lately, but it also made me realize that I can’t possibly go back to Budo yet. There’s just no way I can roll or get dropped repeatedly with my back in this condition.
Some Republican Senators have an even better idea: Abolish the Federal minimum wage altogether. They sponsored a bill that would let states set their own minimum wages below the already inflated Federal minimum wage. This measure would have given states the ability to compete to see who could pay workers less, helping small businesses and attracting new businesses. Some of the poorer states in the South, for example, could set their minimum wages at zero, which would allow family farmers to pay their workers by giving them room and board or scrip instead of cash. They could import workers from places like Africa, where just earning a little food and a roof over their heads would represent a significant improvement in their living standards. The South would finally rise again with this kind of economic stimulus.
What’s needed then is a community tool for content creation, coupled with some ability to monitor and control quality. It’s no good just swamping your game with rubbish content. Ideally it needs some form of QA testing before going live. But if it can be done successfully, then developers can spend some more time working on new game features and maybe even bringing in new level caps between expansion packs, rather than having to write more “fetch me this” and “kill me that” quests.
I tell you what, it’s everywhere as well. Sometimes when I go to the back door and it’s raining I don’t like to go out, so I go to the front door and ask to go out there. And do you know? It’s only blooming raining out there as well!
Maryse Laganière, 25 - budget clerk in school's finance dept
Since hosting the 1992 “Earth Summit,” which produced the first international agreement on forest protection, Brazil has risen from the ninth- to sixth-largest economy, ahead of the U.K. and just behind France. Deforestation in the Amazon last year fell to the lowest rate since government began monitoring the world’s biggest rainforest in 1988. The rate is down almost 80 percent in six years.
It is a splendid book, which is a fascinating read. Most people who know anything about women's education in the last century have heard of Miss Buss and Miss Beale - Frances Mary Buss who founded The North London Collegiate school for Girls and Dorothea Beale, who was headmistress of Cheltenham Ladies' College.
by China.new American big game hunters, their itchy trigger fingers idle since 2006, may be on the verge of returning to China’s Himalayan steppes. Applications made to the State Forestry Administration (China’s top wildlife management authority) by a …
and seas have flown away, I call it
Harris’ academic writings suggest a vision of the writing program that might not be what most Duke parents expect when they encounter the requirement in the first-year orientation packet.
You probably shouldn't plan on leaving the house for Oscars viewing until you hear our fashion tips. That goes for you too, Anna Wintour.
Wednesday, October 24th–I was so sick today that after work a co-worker took me to an after-hours clinic. After X-rays and other tests, I was diagnosed with bronchitis.
1/3-1/2 cup grated or shredded parmesan cheese
This post comes after reading an article about how women can delay motherhood by freezing their ovarian tissue and re-implanting it later on. A few hours before I read that article, a friend of ours was given the heart-breaking news by her doctor that she had suffered a miscarriage.
For much of the nation’s history, applejack, peach brandy and other fruit spirits were key characters in the realm of American drinks. Today, bartenders and craft distillers are rediscovering the appeal of fruit spirits, and this is the most dynamic era in generations for the production and use of these brandies.
It’s also easy to add any other purchase that you might like to your basket.
Considered to be an excellent beginner beer by some and the reason why many are interested in craft beer. The deep orange color and thick white head has aromas of hops and fruits (more citrus). There is a noticeable hop flavor that is nicely complemented by prominent malt flavors. An excellent “hop primer” beer and a great way to show how versatile the hop is.
You can help give a mother hope-filled expectations for her children’s futures.
My last post was May 22nd. Whoa. Sorry for my abscence, between my new addiction (Facebook) and preparing for/going on vacation, I haven't had much to say here...
Leland Ryken
They landed on my blog with this one because I talk about math tables all the time. You know, because I love math so much.
What beauty products do you have your eye on this spring?
Click with caution!
Now this is what I call convenient! Apparently, there is such thing as a crane game that you can play on a web browser. This game goes by the name of [[MORE]]Toreba, which was created by a game developing company known as Cyberstep. You know what the best part of it is? You actually get to win the items that you grab with the claw. If you do manage to win something, the Website will send the prize to your house. However, you might have to pay the shipping fee for it to be sent.
I'll be trying to keep the familiar simplistic design. As a matter of fact I can guarantee that the blog will keep its mostly white appearance, I just think it looks cleaner that way.
I'm looking forward to more studies on these prosimians and the properties of their brachial gland exudates. More research, as well as slow loris bite records, are needed to elucidate the effects of brachial gland exudates on humans.
1 1/2 cup Shortening (I used lard. IT'S NOT THAT BAD FOR YOU, READ THE RESEARCH!)
elbow with a knock, patting my back
Today is also our 6 year wedding anniversary. It's hard to believe six years has already passed since we first married. It's also our official 10 year mark; our wedding date was the four year anniversary of our first date. Ten years is crazy for me to think, but I also couldn't imagine my life without my husband. He's amazing.
Mr Hale said the Department of Immigration was processing the people "quickly and fairly".
Synopsis (from Indiebound): Ivan is an easygoing gorilla. Living at the Exit 8 Big Top Mall and Video Arcade, he has grown accustomed to humans watching him through the glass walls of his domain. He rarely misses his life in the jungle. In fact, he hardly ever thinks about it at all.
But as Wicklow patiently hauled him up to bed the undrunk part of Barley glanced over his shoulder, down the wide staircase. And in the darkness near the entrance, he saw Katya, seated with her legs crossed, her perhaps-bag on her lap. She was wearing a pinched black jacket. A white silk scarf was knotted under her chin, and her face was pressed towards him with that tense smile she had, sad and hopeful, open to love.
Abnormal Status Resistance: 30% at max level (I think it might also be Elemental Resistance).
Not surprisingly the kids both fell asleep on the way back to the campground so we had a bit of a messy bedtime trying to sponge them down (they were FILTHY!) and get them back to sleep before a lazy dinner and we both crashed ourselves.
First off, sorry to everyone who has emailed or commented here lately. My week was beyond crazy so I didn't have a lot of time for blogging. I've also become addicted to a new TV show that I've been trying to pull myself away from. :) Did anyone else see the new Revenge episode Wednesday night where we finally got to see who was shot at the White Party???
We've all seen the commercials and billboards for them. And, sure enough, they are sprouting up everywhere you turn. Otherwise desolate strip malls are now decorated with bright yellow signs promising you cash for all of your unwanted gold. The ads all sort of start out the same, implying that most of us have extra sacks of pirate booty hiding in our attics and under our beds just waiting to be melted down and cashed in on. Are you sick of carrying around dead stinky grandma’s stinky old dead jewelry? She’s dead and you’re poor, so get rich! Get rich now.
He then went on to rant, making even more of a fool of himself, stating because it was all a pack of lies no one should read the blogs and he was going to have his lawyers sue the three of us - May I commend, before he wastes more UKIP money on such a fools errand, that he considers the response of Prestram vs. Arkell.
It came to 8p.
Ohhhh
On Wednesday morning, we woke up as usual. We normally cuddle and have a Moment together before starting our day. This morning she woke with a smile as usual, but then started to pinch and squeeze my face. I react to this by simply pulling my face away, then returning to her. She kept at it, really hurting me. So we got out of bed and carried on with our day.
vesperian sorrow Petit Theatre, Rouyn-Noranda, Canada (11-03-2006)
This does not spread easily or quickly. All the promises are lies.
Because of our research on downsizing, which you can download for free here, and my former work as Account Executive for the Pepsi Cola account, I don’t think downsizing is the answer. I think that getting back to basics and remembering what makes Pepsi exciting for its consumers is what will bring that stock price back up. When I would call on Coke, they would never utter the “P” word. Maybe it was arrogance, or maybe it was a total devotion to dominating the market. Maybe Pepsi needs to take on that same mind-set.
Kunt
Anwaar: Kill? Kill? Kill? Is that all you do. Go on! Kill me! But you shall never kill my soul, for my legacy shall live forever. Eventually more women will wake up, and they will fight you. Then you shall suffer.
Anyway, I thought it was time to clear some of them out and hopefully make something nice in the process.
Saturday is, I must confess, basically an over-caffeinated rerun of Friday, so allow me to leave you with the highlights encapsulated in a few choice quotations while the closing credits roll to the background music of “Me and my Shadow”.
Singh J, Scott LH. Threshold for carbon monoxide induced fetotoxicity. Teratology 1984; 30: 253-257.
Almost 142 million people live in Russia today (the peak was nearly 149 million in 1991, before the breakup of the Soviet Union took some land and people away from Russia). Most people have homes in urban areas of the European part of the country, or western Russia. This is where most jobs in factories and offices are found.
Uh, I’m back. Now to continue this highly complex procedure – if you’re feeling fancy, lay a few slices of lemon over the dill and then lay on the fish, drizzle with the tiniest bit of olive oil and add salt and freshly ground black pepper.
Now, I want to be clear: it’s not just big business that gets involved in lobbying. Charities and other organisations, including trade unions, do it too. What’s more, when it’s open and transparent, when people know who is meeting who, for what reason and with what outcome, lobbying is perfectly reasonable.
Today was a super busy day!
2. Material blessings.
- 23g egg whites
Basically making lasagne is about making pasta, béchamel and bolognese and putting everything together. It's easy, but it does take quite a bit of time and organisation. There is however no need to go the Bologna Chamber of Commerce way and cook your meat in milk etc for the bolognese because once you've mixed your meat sauce with the béchamel you wouldn't quite remember how it looked like before.
Hi all, it's Agnes here!
Once upon a time, there was a red cell phone. It was an LG EnV3 that wasn’t really red, but maroon, and it belonged to Bekah. Every day, it faithfully did its job. It took her phone calls and collected her text messages. It rang and beeped mostly appropriately so that she would know to respond to the other people trying to contact her. Most of the time, the phone even maintained a good relationship with the Jawbone Bluetooth unit. They were hardly ever not on speaking terms, working in tandem so that Bekah could multitask and use her phone while driving. Life was good for the red cell phone. Many thought provoking discussions were facilitated by it, and even more encouraging and informative text messages were passed along by it.
Only on Practicum for 4 more weeks! I'm excited but I will also miss my students. I come home with the funniest quotes every day & I always walk out of there feeling inspired. The only tough bit about it is that I'm obviously in other teachers' classes, so I don't always know what I'm doing until the day before I'm doing it, & it is hard to get a real sense of how I'd take a class because I'm always being watched. Apparently, though, I'm very patient & have good ideas & motivate productivity in the students. The only thing I really need to work on is being louder when I'm trying to gain the class' attention, but I want to save my voice! So I'll try harder with that.
Cut or shred the larger pieces of chicken and return to soup OR save chicken for chicken salad. The bones with bits of chicken can be reserved for, as Julia Child used to say, “a private meal.”
Thing to Think About Today:
Mary-Anne Parker – Religious Educators Representative; Western Region
‘Right, I see. Thing is you haven’t paid either of us our probationary bonus or commission on getting seven kids signed for classes’.
In Israel today, the Olmert government's incredibly bad decision to swap the bodies of two Israelis Hezbollah kidnapped and murdered for the release of six Hezbollah terrorists from Israeli prisons and the bodies of a number of others has been carried out.
In 1939, Jerry Siegel offered a “Scientific Explanation for Superman’s Amazing Strength”: “The smaller size of our planet, with its slighter gravity pull, assists Superman’s tremendous muscles in the performance of miraculous feats of strength!”
Most of the people July interviewed, for reasons of class or age or culture, did not own a computer. Such people are not long for this world, and represent the crossroads of an era. Much like the dawn of the industrial age that hangs over masterpieces like À la Recherche du Temps Perdu and The Magnificent Ambersons, the author modestly but surely documents an elegy for a dying world.
It seems that the use of a certain term in my last post caused some confusion, though the term itself wasn’t what was in focus (nor should have been). I have been wondering whether I was to imprecise in my use, but given that I didn’t mean anything by the use, maybe nor even agreeing in the term itself, I find it somehow difficult to agree on that one. The term was ‘Islamism,’ a term used about certain radical Muslim elements today, such as Sayyid Qutb and Wassim al-Banna, who are called ‘Islamist.’ The term though hasn’t always been used in that sense, originally being termed about Islam and Muslims, the latter who were also called ‘Muhammadans,’ based on a false belief that they worship Muhammad, as Christians are worshiping Jesus. The confusion is understandable, at least for people who don’t know much about other religions, but is still flawed.
Yeehaw!!
When the stroller is parked, use the baby carrier, baby backpack or the harness. It's such a great idea to keep those little ones close, who invented the toddler leash anyway? Whoever did, I love that woman! Must have been a woman, it's so wonderful! The backpack and baby carriers are very popular too, and wonderful. Anything to keep the parents comfortable and the little ones safely closeby while standing in line is well worth it to bring along.
The second year is Juan Gonzalez's MVP season of 1996. The first is Juan Gonzalez's 1993 season. And the truth is that Gonzalez's 1993 season isn't just better, it's A LOT better. Why? Well, for one thing that first season, runs were much harder to come by. In 1993, his 46 homers led the league (as did his .632 slugging percentage). In 1996, of course, offense had exploded, and his 46 homers placed him fifth in the league.
Good morning everyone, and Happy Easter Sunday! So I have yet to take any pictures of food from this year's family Easter celebration, but I promise they're coming soon. In the meantime, here are photos from last year, as well as some recipes previously posted on this site.
Folk have been getting their shit together on a business tip too. The uncompromising DIY ethic that the scene was built on still runs through it, but artists seem to enjoy further reach thanks to the internet and its myriad resources. More acts seem to be getting out on the road, hooking up deals and using the social-networking realm to promote themselves.
While the Umno president took time yesterday to have breakfast in Bangsar with four Twitter followers and attend a wedding dinner later that same night ahead of a vacation in the next two weeks, party leaders are talking up the likelihood of polls being called by next month.
Years later, Mardi Gras remains a low-key holiday for me, but I do try to whip up some pancakes on that day when I can. That said, I don't make just any pancakes, nor would I use a mix. I always make these pancakes. These pancakes, which never fail me, are always light and fluffy with a hint of sweetness.
Final Report of the Select Committee to Study Governmental Operations, U.S. Senate, April 1976, p. 337
We all need that peace, don’t we? There are often so many competing voices seeking to bring us down and make us feel anxious or hurt or frustrated or inadequate or angry. We may well find things in life that give us great peace and joy—a wonderful partner, an interesting job, a new home, success in some area, good friends. But God’s peace goes beyond all of these.
The Girl Scout Promise
They should not fly
We checked in, and the Imaging Department receptionist gave us fish food to feed the fish. I had to go to the restroom, which gave Nate exactly two minutes to look at the trains. Then they called us back. The anesthesiologist was very nice and told Nate they were going to take him back to a room and give him "silly air" that would make him laugh. Nate looked concerned. He said, "I don't want to laugh too much!" They promised they wouldn't let him giggle too much. I was relieved when the Dr. said he was going to put in the IV after they gassed him, because Nate really hates IV's. He was not at all impressed by my story about one of Nate's previous MRI's when he stopped breathing and his lips turned blue. He said he understood why that was a big deal to me, but it happened all the time and wasn't really a big deal. Hmph. The anesthesiologist carried Nate and Seal the Sea Lion away while talking to him and really distracting him from knowing I wasn't following. I received instructions that they would call me in about an hour and a half, so I could go get something to eat in the food court, but to stay close.
Talking Main Event Magazine Blues by Mike Edison
Not for: Those who are looking for a feel-good book. The stories are mostly tragic and also very true.
When a man and a woman are married and they agree, or covenant, to limit their offspring to two or three, and practice devices to accomplish this purpose, they are guilty of iniquity which eventually must be punished. Unfortunately this evil doctrine is being taught as a virtue by many people who consider themselves cultured and highly educated. It has even crept in among members of the Church and has been advocated in some of the classes within the Church.
Flash forward to December 26. There you sit, in your latest ugly Christmas sweater that already has a splotch of holiday gravy on the front, wondering how to avoid looking like a schlub when you uncork the champagne you've been assigned to purchase for the next family inquisition commonly known as New Year's Eve.
“Not that you lied to me but that I no longer believe you has shaken me.”—
Some are short, others are long.
Where I am as I write this. At home.
So me and my friends are plotting new projects that are supposed to come to life in the summer. LOOk Forward to them. I really hope I will have time for them, no, I must.
“Each suspect was interviewed in separate interview rooms, and frequently moved around between rooms and cells,” Roderick said.“All suspects were searched incident to arrest, but none were strip or body cavity searched.”
Red rider wagon.
The need to discover what’s concealed.
And since I was thinking about running, I took up Ruth's challenge to write about scents. I wasn't sure where to begin so I sketched out the place where I generally begin and end my runs. There was a jar of colored pencils nearby so I did a bit more coloring as I thought about the scents I encounter on the trail. There are summer scents and spring scents. Good scents like the berry blossoms or the ripe berries as summer arrives. Sometimes the grass smells great but in the heat of the summer, it can be a harsh scent. The river can smell cold and fresh when the snow has melted and the water moves swiftly toward the ocean. Or it can smell stale and fishy when the days are dry and hot.
Thanks Moda for the fun hop and for supplying me with wonderful giveaways! Lucky winners, please shoot us an e-mail with your address at notions@frenchgeneral.com with Blog Hop Giveaway in the subject line and we will ship out a French General surprise box. Thanks for playing and sorry about the tardiness of the post last week - but I think I caught it just in time!
Your voice is vaguely familiar,
With such an enthusiastic group of maritime merrymakers, and considering the rapid inflation of numbers over the years, next year’s event is sure to attract far more attention than just the confused pedestrians walking alongside the fabulous flotilla. With both major endorsements from international alcoholic beverage companies and an inflatable dinghy manufacturer in the offing, next year’s event is sure to be another massive success.
Wow, being a mom is just so intense. It is wonderful. It is more than I dreamed in so many ways. Who could have ever imagined or expressed the magnitude of a mother's love?
“You could earn more money,” came the impatient reply, “and buy a better boat so you could go deeper and catch more fish. You could purchase nylon nets, catch even more fish, and make more money. Soon you’d have a fleet of boats and be rich like me.”
We moved to Columbus, Georgia the following year. And 4 other sisters were adopted from the same orphanage. The parties thrown at our house in Columbus, Georgia were absolutely spectacular and very posh. Christmas was always my favorite time of the year. As I got older, we learned to cook and bake with the same enthusiasm as she did! No complaints there BECAUSE I relish in all those fabulous memories then and are profoundly making present and new memories. And, one thing I did learn from my dad was ..."to clean up as you go along" so that at the end there would not be a BIG mess to clean! To this day, I still practice that very simple rule. It drives my present family crazy to this day BUT it works!
Another name I came up with over the weekend was "My Husband Wants the Farm but I'm Reluctant" Farm. Not catchy enough though. ;)
struggling so much, yet still make it possible to help us! I LOVE YOU
Here’s a question – do you have a cheat day? A day where you can just have what you like? I have one meal, usually Friday night where I buy 6 pork dumplings from the Co-op Deli. They’re made by Wok and Grill and I really enjoy them warmed up with some Thai Spring Sauce.
It's been "one of those days". You know, the kind where you run around nonstop but don't actually get to anything on your to do list? Yep, "one of those days..."
Jesus has redefined the “vineyard” as himself and he will succeed in fulfilling the covenant as the true Israel. While Israel failed as the custodians of the vineyard, Jesus will succeed and his twelve disciples constitute a new Israel.
Some of the plants in your landscape can help you decorate for the Christmas season as you prune them for next year. Holly and Boxwood can be trimmed now with some of the cuttings used to accent wreaths or live indoor plants. And, some of the inside growth of evergreens such as White Pine, Norway Spruce, Blue Spruce, even some of the seed heads of ornamental grassed can be used to make a harvest wreath or basket for your front door or porch. Talk about recycling! After Christmas, you can take them to your compost bin and make them future fertilizer! Along with these Holiday tips, here are a few other ideas for the month:
The boy’s brother, who is 4 years old, was also inside but he was not hurt. Martin says the 9-year-old boy told officials at nearby Hoggard Elementary School about the scene at the house. No other details were released
Summing up the last month or so...
“Do you love me?”
And that’s how I learn Dad’s name.
The Coalition had intended a two-hour sit-down beginning 2pm at Kuala Lumpur’s iconic Independence Square, but could only assemble around the square following a court order obtained by the police on 27 April preventing the public from entering the area until 1 May 2012. Multiple barriers and a razor wire were also erected around the square which was heavily guarded by riot police on the day of the protest. Chaos ensued after the crowd which had congregated from late morning was forced to disperse after police fired tear gas and shot chemical-laced water at them, and incidence of violence from both sides were reported.
Squeeze the juice of quartered lime into the bottom of the serving bowl. Ladle noodle soup into bowl making sure to get a good mix of noodle, shrimp, and vegetable, top with fresh herbs, and a slice of lime.
So you dare to say it all out loud
ISBN: 978-0-307-71654-5
Location: Brookville NY
I felt the firm grip of love’s hand guiding me.
Ok, so, you wake up in an anonymous hotel room–oops, wrong movie. Or is it? Both Memento and Shutter Island show no mercy for widowers. If your wife was killed, you did it. Sorry. You just have to accept that. Otherwise, you’re playing mind games with yourself.
The mother grows up defiant and unafraid. She lives through the turbulent periods following the second world war and eventually becomes an ardent communist. She meets her husband, Jung Chang's father who has already shown his mettle as a Communist terrorist. Jung Chang's father is dedicated to communism. He refuses to make allowances for his wife, and when they have to march long distances is unsympathetic to her exhaustion, and even when this is shown to be due to pregnancy (after a miscarriage) he is little warmer. He seems cold, disciplined and above all highly principled.
The Internet yielded a couple of promising-seeming recepies for fig paste, and feeling terribly scientific I decided to try them both. Having beaten the wasps to a bucket full of figs I divided my spoils into two piles and set to. Method one involved gently heating lemon juice, figs, sugar and cinnamon, until the resulting gloop becomes glazed. Alas, the only thing that glazed was my eyes, as fig soup bubbled discretely away for what seemed like hours. Only then did I notice that this recipe specifies dried figs as a starting point. Damn. A couple of fruitier expletives later I popped to the shop to buy vast quantities of sugar, turned up the heat and added some apple. The resulting jam is lovely.
The ECJ considered the proper construction of Article 5(1)(a) of the Trade Marks Directive and Article 9(1)(a) of the Trade Marks Regulation. It held that a trade mark proprietor is entitled to prevent an online marketplace operator from advertising for sale goods bearing its trade mark using a keyword which is identical to the trade mark, where that advertising does not enable reasonably well-informed and observant internet users to ascertain (easily) whether the goods concerned originate from the proprietor of the trade mark or from a linked business or, on the contrary, originate from a third party.
Pull off the outer petals one at a time and dip them in your sauce of choice. Turn the petal dip side down in your mouth and remove the flesh by scraping along your lower teeth. Discard the petal. Continue until all petals are removed. You are now left with a hairy 'choke' and the heart. The choke should be removed by cutting and scraping away. Cut the heart in pieces and continue dipping.
Lifting a red gas canister before the cameras, a girl named Shannon demonstrates her claimed addiction of drinking gasoline for TLC'S television program My Strange Addiction.
“How about a tutu and a pair of wings?”
Niamh Bagnell
(CHORUS A)
You will have to let me know what you think about this one! I love these fun colors and am thinking I really like this card! This stamp is becoming a fast favorite....I know....I have alot of those don't I? :)
Me: You do sound like a 15 year old. His parents can visit us if they want.
Cook bacon in small skillet over medium heat for 5 minutes. Drain and set aside. Combine stock, garlic, potatoes, celery, salt, and pepper in large pot and bring to low boil. Simmer for 20 minutes. Remove from heat and puree. Return to stove over medium heat. Add lemon zest and cream. Simmer for 5 minutes. Garnish with bacon and lemon wedge.
‘Marque’ is related to ‘marching’ and means crossing or marching across a boarder in order to do a reprisal. So a Letter of Marque and Reprisal would authorize a private person, not in the U.S. armed forces, to conduct reprisal operations outside the country’s boarders.
When I first put The Homesick Texan cookbook on hold at the Madison Public Library, I was expecting it to fit with one of my favorite habits: every once in a while, I like to pop a bowl of popcorn in the afternoon and sit down and read a cookbook all the way through. When I was little, this cookbook was most often a reread of Food that Really Schmecks, a very readable and cozily written collection of recipes from Mennonite families and other cooks in Southwestern Ontario. The tone of the book is nicely captured in the passage in which the author cheerfully admits in the first few pages that she included many recipes taken from her mother’s little black notebook without testing them (and, in fact, I once, in frustration, wrote “These just don’t work!” in red pencil next to the recipe for Sugar Cookies in Schmecks to avoid further frustrating attempts at the recipe.
The movement to oppose the NDAA is proving to be a remarkable cross-section of American politics and diversity, and last night’s audience was no exception. Two members of the Japanese-American Citizens League reminded the audience that Japanese-Americans were once indefinitely detained without due process; Ron Paul supporters emphasized that they were Constitutional conservatives; Muslim-Americans asked probing questions and noted that they were bearing the brunt of the civil liberties losses of the past decade; Occupy supporters wondered about the connection between NDAA and the Occupy movement — and pointed to the Occupy movement as an example of people taking politics into their own hands.
I really enjoyed it and since getting my new bike for Christmas, I have been thinking about doing another one. In February, I started a triathlon training class at our YMCA and it ended today with our class competing in the Tri the Rock triathlon.
The secret to posting with images is to use Explorer rather than FireFox.
She feels another tear trying to squeeze out the corner of her eye and wipes it away. She kind of thinks Gram is wrong on this one. Names do hurt. She’d rather have the broken bones.
A few weeks before my senior year Homecoming, sulking because the first guy I asked said no, I was stopped in the hallway by my friend Gabe, who was determined to break me from my poutiness. She knew that a mutual friend of ours, and a guy that I had always admired but was "just friends" with, had also been rejected by the one he had asked. So, Gabe pulled me along the hallway until we met up with Tor, and said something along the lines of, "Tor, Tyrean has something to ask you about Homecoming." (I did? Oh...) and I can't remember what I actually said, but it was a pretty bad invitation, in the midst of which I realized I was actually nervous and his answer mattered. (Maybe I liked him more than I previously thought?)
I do have a simple card to share from the first SSD set that I purchased....It made me laugh, as so many of the SSD sets do, and I was hooked on Heathers stamps. The set I bought was "You know your get old when"....this is the set....
Mary: I have seen the Lord.
This is The Man's side table. Truth be told, he would probably prefer it remain bare except for the phone & the lamp. That would be just wishfullness on his part & he knows that's not going to happen!
In a full-circle story, this church was where I played my very first Christmas Eve service, many many many many years ago. I remember that night they turned off all the lights when it came time to sing Silent Night for the candle lighting, so a beautiful little girl came forward with her candle and knelt beside me so I could see my music. It's one of my favorite Christmas memories of all time. And that girl's mother became my dear friend.
April 24, 2012
I'm so very honored & privileged to be given an opportunity to be a Guest Designer on Sundays with Crissy. Crissy Armstrong creates such beautiful images one of which is this little sweetie called "Say a Prayer". The theme for October at Sundays with Crissy is Thanks or Thanksgiving so I thought what better way to say thanks than to offer up a sweet prayer......."Thank you for being you". This could be to a dear friend or as a special thank you prayer to the Lord for all He has done.
while my 4 year old, and 2 year old were trying to out scream each other underneath my feet.....
If capitalists are somehow mainstream or right wing, and socialists and communists progressively left wing, then Nazi, which is socialist by definition, is a lunatic version of left wing.
Countless writings underlie the urgency for our modern world, with all its bustle and noise, of rediscovering the value of meditation, of silence, of prayer, of devotion. I preached it before I practiced it. If one is to help the world toward this rediscovery, one must practice it oneself. The religious life must be fed. We devote years to studying a trade or profession. Ought we to show less perseverance in acquiring the experience of God? The least player of billiards or chess knows how long he has to spend in order to learn to play and how many games he had to lose before winning one. The scientist, when an experiment fails, instead of abandoning it, asks himself whether there has not slipped into his arrangements or his calculations some cause of error. One of my patients had a dream. She was given the task of keeping alight the fire under the boiler. A voice kept saying to her: “Put coal on regularly. Don’t let the fire go out.” Recently I saw a young woman who after several years of great spiritual adventure, was swamped in overwhelming difficulties. I happened to mention to her that during the last twelve years, I could count the days on which I had neglected to write down during meditation what I thought God had expected of me. A few days later she wrote me: “I am grateful for what you said. It is a long time since I gave up the habit of written meditation. Someone told me that after a time one had made sufficient spiritual progress to be able to keep contact with God all day long, without having to reserve any special time for listening to Him!”
Friday marked our 100th day in the NICU. It was also my adjusted due date. My body seems to know this, as I have begun to loose copious amounts of hair. I'm sure this is just hormonal and has nothing to do with my stress levels.
My father died at 7:30 on Halloween night in 1992 and we always raise a glass in his honor. I will never be sad remembering his death date, because Halloween is my favorite day of the year.
The listener started from his trance -
Old Mother Nature is a cruel mistress at times. The nights are drawing in, the mornings are getting wetter, I’m dreading the clocks going back and then – as if to poke a wound – it starts to warm up. Compared to the terrible summer we had, it’s almost tropical in London at the moment. High’s of 28; where was this weather in August!
Be sure to follow, comment and tell your friends!!
For the record, I do think Satan exists. In my opinion, he’s kind of like the Wizard of Oz; behind the smoke, lights and big scary machine, there’s a small, scared, pitiful person operating that machine. The difference is that while the Wizard of Oz constructed it himself, Satan’s frightening guise is our making. He only has as much power in your individual life as you yourself give him. In truth, you have power over him.
So that is what I did. We lay together in the bed, I'm naked, she's close to naked but not quite. She rested her head on my chest and told me that she was starting to feel bad because she loves her husband but she wanted something different so bad, she wanted me so bad. As she told me about what she was feeling I stroked her hair and listened. That is how we fell to sleep.
I would say that the deal was all about the real estate benefit for the private developer, not about tending to, sustaining, or managing the community asset of the hospital.
Flip Seat GREAT! Just open the catches and flip it over.
A business hotel run by people who probably never traveled for business.
05.08: Villa te Koop, Den Haag, Holland
Our parish life. We are so very, very blessed in our parish life. The prayers and hugs and love that we are receiving from the St Barbara community takes my breath away. And the offers to help. Eva will take me shopping and also take Bella sometimes. Betty will stay with me when Ken is gone long periods for work. Actually, there are so many people offering to help. Marilyn C has offered to read to me when I can no longer read to myself. It is true, God never closes one door without opening another. In exchange for my mobility, I am allowed to see more love and care.
Expect to see 1940s/50s black and white comedy shorts, vintage cartoons, Pathe news reels and educational oddities.
In July 1991, Sophie Ristelhueber travelled to Yugoslavia with writer Jean Rolin. However, she did not come back with photographs of the fighting between Serbs and Croats; instead, two years later, and after much thought, she started work on Every One in a Parisian hospital. Also published in book form, these giant format photographs of bodies bearing their recent stitches, which seem to have no direct link with war, become an allegory.
We were supposed to have our yard sale this weekend, but the weather might not work so that might be put off for another weekend. Time is so short, and there is so much to do. It feels like being in labor!! I feel like I am in transition, the part where you just want to say "Enough,I am going home, I'll have this baby later." That's me this week, I want to say, enough let's forget about packing and cleaning an painting, but like labor you can't just quit, so I will press on. Also like labor though, at the end you get a really sweet baby, this time we get a really great farm! Have a wonderful day and may God bless you the whole day through.
And it’s there, in the rubble of Cedar Rapids, that Jeannie finally despairs, and tries to kill her daughter in order to save her best friend, in order to protect the revolution. In the first first draft Jeannie succeeds and this sacrifice is sort of like the moral power that helps the revolution along.
There are elements of myself in both heroines, but yet they are stronger than I think I could ever be. The journalist, Lee, lives with my recurring nightmare and my affinity with the Holocaust. I have often said, “I am a Gentile with a Jewish soul.” The pianist, Grace, reflects my more naive, pollyanna side. And yet, the one time I headed into the Rwandan conflict that proved the UN’s promise of “never again” would the world tolerate another genocide to be an outright lie, I went with complete faith, like Grace, that I was protected from harm.
The Mandragora plant has been used since Greco-Roman times, and it’s even mentioned in the Bible. Hippocrates noted that a small dose would relieve anxiety and the deepest depression. If drunk its hypnotic properties allowed amputation or cauterisation. It was also used as an aphrodisiac and cure for sterility. Today we know that it contains the psychoactive alkaloids hiosciamine, scopolamine and madragorine (a powerful narcotic and hypnotic, chemically identical to atropine). However, long before its active principles had been identified, it had been used to produce both therapeutic (the mandragora wine was probably the first anaesthetic used in surgery), and obscure and poisoning effects, especially during the European Middle Ages. Both the root and its method of picking were associated with superstition and mysterious popular legends (due to its spindle-shaped root which is often forked beneath, and is therefore compared, in shape, to the human figure). Mandrake root, was supposed to utter a dreadful shriek when pulled from the ground and whoever heard the shriek died. To collect it, a dog was tied to the plant and tempted with meat. Indeed Shakespeare makes use of its properties in many of his plays.
And, as a photographer, I get to enclose myself in a small box, and watch the epic world story being written -- one child at a time, two lovers at a time. It's a rare opportunity, and one I've come to cherish more and more lately.
Do your kids have a favorite lovey or food they like to sleep with?
There has to pass a bit more time until we can talk about it ^^
Zucchini Bread
So, why is this even a topic of debate? Well the recently completed county audit by Evergreen suggested that the county adopt an ad valorem method of sales tax distribution. In other words use the taxes collected based upon the distribution of property values; the same method used for taxing property. This would shift $1.3million dollars that had been being alocated by the cities to be retained by the county government for budget use, or for tax relief to all county taxpayers.
Who do you think caused that? The angels of course! They haven’t retired since then either. Angels are at work today just as they’ve always been. A few years ago in one of Israel‘s major wars, the enemy had their guns turned on Israeli cities. Those guns were the finest military equipment money could buy. They had a range of at least 20 miles and were equipped with electronic gun sights for accuracy. But something very odd happened. Every time they fired the guns at the Israelis, they either over shot or fell far short of their targets. We know there was nothing wrong with the guns because later the Israelis captured them and fired back at he enemy with perfect success.
Salt- 2 pinches
An ex-employee at the Southwestern Institute of Forensic Sciences complained about tainted rape kits, blood stock and DNA analysis at the Dallas crime lab.
Losing the HRM signal and never getting it back:
Then there is the random draw on each of the designers blogs for the Sneak Peeks :)
Here's how to make your own:
Wipe down the interior of the box with a damp rag and allow to fully dry. Tap the box body. It should resound to the blow. Boxes that respond with a dull thud should be replaced.
But I also believe that I must be one of the fans that have little concern about this trend of playing better away from home. The trend that some of the players: Nolasco, Hayes and Stanton, feel “better” playing in the West Coast, especially in California.
Although this is the third book in the acclaimed Little House series, it stands alone. My siblings and I returned over and over to this story of Almanzo Wilder and his growing up years on a farm in New York State. Our favorite parts? The specific descriptions of the Wilder family’s giant, farm fresh meals. Apple pie for breakfast? Sign me up! Cheerios suddenly just weren’t good enough. My mother pointed out that Almanzo followed his pastry-filled morning meal by working all afternoon in the fields, and would I like to follow suit on that, too? Touche, Mom. Touche.
I’ll be honest, making french macaroons REALLY intimidates me. They are a tricky business. A good french macaroon has a smooth top and a crinkly bottom (otherwise known as a “foot.”) If over-baked, over-mixed, or with too much humidity, none of these lovely things happen. The french macaroon (or so I have read) is a good test of a baker’s skill, because following the recipe is not quite enough. You must respond to the ingredients, the environment, and know just how to execute the dessert on that given day.
Reduced vulnerability and romantic capability
I included the above quote from the book because I wanted to point out just how amazing Beth Revis is at creating a real sense of fear, loneliness, and desperate entrapment aboard Godspeed. In fact, the strange and alien world inside the ship was probably one of the most fascinating aspects of this book. It was sort of like this dystopian microcosm, where everything is in miniature and everyone basically lives in captivity like animals. It is the job of "Eldest," the leader of the ship, to maintain order and keep out the causes of discord on Godspeed as it courses its way through the Great Unknown towards a planet that is impossibly far away. The setting was just very refreshing and different.
It does not matter how large or small a garden is, we can all do something to help them.
06/17 - Phoenix, AZ Cricket Wireless Pavilion
“We are an exporter of security forces to NATO,” Mr. Poposki said in an interview on Thursday. “But we are in the waiting room for membership.”
Cholesterol = 0 g;
anyway....
More than half of Belgium’s Jews survived the Holocaust. This was a greater proportion than that for the Jews of France and of Italy, and considerably greater than the figure of only a quarter for Dutch Jews. One reason for this is that the majority of Belgian Jews were recent immigrants who had fled persecution in Eastern Europe and Germany. As many had already faced antisemitism firsthand, they were more wary of how it could escalate and they therefore more easily gravitated towards resistance activities.
Peel the pears leaving the stalks on. Remove the cores.
I thought that was neat, so I pulled out my phone, looked up the dwarf house in Hapeville, GA, and read that this is where it all started. There is even a little tiny door in keeping with the “dwarf house” name. They have menu of diner food and chick-fil-a standard items. What a neat, early morning, airport adventure!
"Lisa Scottoline. She writes a column for the Philadelphia Inquire and she also has written a bunch of novels. I saw her on some local cable show and I just love her." My mom gushed about Lisa Scottoline for a few more minutes.
Harper Connelly series by Charlaine Harris--read 1 out of 4 (series finished?) A woman who was struck by lightning can now find dead people.
“No!” she screamed and knocked his hand away. She stared at his raised gun and her outstretched hand. What the hell was she doing? She wanted the man dead, so why had she stopped him?
Yes, that is a word...well a word I use A LOT, so to me that counts enough to make it a valid word!
The best TV show, though, snuck right in under the wire at the close of the year. Charlie Brooker's Black Mirror was thought-provoking, well-made telly with high production values and nuanced acting, and in a TV landscape littered with police procedurals, cookery shows and structured reality (TOWIE, Desperate Scousewives), it stuck out like a diamond in a slurry pit. Three separate, unrelated peeks into the lives of people in parallel universes, their connecting thread seemed to be our reliance on technology and its propensity to hurl us all towards dystopia (more cynical readers may see the ongoing existence of this blog as further evidence). He's acknowledged his debt to The Twilight Zone, and I hope this latter-day Rod Serling gets a recommission, because there are precious few stand-alone TV dramas being made right now, and even fewer as stylish and clever as Black Mirror.
The job openings rate (the red line below) increased to 2.7% in March, the highest rate of job openings since the middle of 2008. Since the end of the Great Recession, the rate of job openings has had an upward trend and is a cause for optimism about household formations and housing demand in the medium term.
I worry less about petty things and as I relax, events simply unfold, setting everything in the right direction, without my effort. There is something in the saying "to go with the flow". On several occasions recently have I found myself in certain dispositions, but I simply refused to let these situations bring me down. Eventually they all resolved on their own, to my great astonishment.
health care.
But I believe that the Lord cares mostly about our hearts...
Did we see any ghosts? Do you see the shadow of someone in the window, but no one’s standing there? What? You think it’s me? Absolutely not. I’m telling you we got out of there just in time and high-tailed it all the way to Denbigh.
In 1971, Wilson dropped his C.I.A. connection and was a part of Task Force 157, a secret Navy intelligence unit that employed 50 to 75 agents to monitor and collect information on Soviet shipping. It reported not only on routine cargo items but also watched for the covert shipment of military goods and nuclear weapons. The unit also was charged with the responsibility of picking up intelligence operatives from Taiwan and secretly ferrying them inside mainland China, where they would implant sensitive seismic monitors and radio equipment. Those operations were stopped after President Richard M. Nixon’s visit to Peking in 1972, and C.I.A. officials were astonished to learn later that some of the sensitive equipment, designed solely for use inside China, was appearing for sale in the international arms market.
With the exception of our archdiocesan paper promoting the new faction, it remains unclear what the position of the archdiocese actually is when it comes to identifying Catholic Social Teaching with the OWS movement, much less promoting our involvement. As of this writing, I’m unaware of Archbishop Vlazny having ever commented publicly on the the subject. I may be wrong, of course, and welcome input from any reader with information I may have missed.
Fog weeps against my windshield as I drive;
Beyond that, though, there isn’t much. And I wish there were. For M.A. was a connection to the yellowed pages of Grandpa’s earliest history. His father, Robert Earl Sr., died in 1959, when my mother was even younger than I was at the time of M.A.’s death. And Grandpa’s birth mother died when he was barely 2. Of pneumonia, we were told. While she was pregnant. Grandpa was sent to stay with his mother’s parents for several years while his father started over, met Florence, and began a new life before sending for him to join their family, which included a new younger brother, Dickie. Grandpa would often point out the house in New Philadelphia where he was raised in his boyhood by his Fisher grandparents. But beyond that, I didn’t hear much.
This leaves every other drinker in the marketplace without a Brew Dog beer in his hand, because he will never buy products which tell him what a clown he is for doing so. (The rest of the label essentially tells the drinker what an ignoramus he probably is.)
For a long time I felt that we did not have a closure, but looking back, we had. Days before I left for the Philippines, we met at a café house and parted in a very good way possible. I recalled too that I was hurt when we bid goodbye to each other because it made me realize that we are not of each others’ anymore.
bits of light, electrical energy, brain blips -
Somewhere in there I probably should start packing.
Somedays, I just don't feel like fighting my paper trimmer. And unfortunately, there are so many crafty goodies that I want that the thought of spending money on something I already have just doesn't work for me. The crooked lines from my trimmer are kind of driving me crazy right now, though. See what I mean?
While House is assisting 13, the patient the team is working on goes berserk. He jumps from his bed and stabs Doctor Adams in the throat and she crumples to the floor. Doctor Chase attempts to subdue the patient and gets his throat cut and is spewing blood. He then unceremoniously throws Doctor Chi Park out the picture window. Doctor Foreman rushes in with a security team and moves toward Chase to tend his wounds. The crazed patient charges the guards and a security officer pulls his gun in panic and fires. His aim was not true. Foreman is hit and lies on the ground dying. Moments later, the patient is subdued but Adams, Chase, Foreman, and Park lay dead on the hospital floor.
I know people love shopping on Etsy because most sellers offer custom items and personalization. Do you think customers would like it if I offered custom appliqued monograms for an additional $3 per towel?
PV - 14' 10.25" - Amy Linnen, Arizona - '02
Stamps: Tim Holtz Odds and Ends from Stampers Anonymous
For pizza, Shakey’s Pizza has all-you-can-eat specials that range in price from about ¥800 to ¥1,900 depending on what day and what time you go (lunch time on regular weekdays is cheapest).
By “wars” in this case, I mean:
‘White folk’s greed runs a world in need’ — again. Damn those free markets.
While this particular volume has many different styles and over 1000 illustrations of various fashions. The first chapter in particular is of interest to people enamored of the regency and federalist era.
The fun-loving hedonists in Reykjavik! are without a doubt one of Iceland’s most eclectic and powerful additions to music. This collective six member act of philosophy majors, shopmongers and social workers stands out in a rock scene dominated by testosterone and various hipsterati. Singer Bóas provides a friendly atmosphere, drummer Kristján supplies a steady, rocking beat, bassist Valdi gets with the dementia and the twin-guitar assault of cousins Haukur and Gummi smears icing on an already overloaded cacophonous cake.
Life is sorrow, overcome it.
Joe quickly made the beautiful Great Pyrenees sit in front of me. I bent down, wrapped my arms around it’s large neck, and buried my face in it’s damp fur. I could hear it whimpering wanting to be released from the command to sit. Joe smiled and I was nearly knocked down as the muddy paws came up to my chest. I grabbed at it’s fur and said, “Ah, you’re a good baby!” Joe grabbed my wrists dragging me and said, “But, you’re not.” He dragged me across the room to a bedroom door with me struggling against him. When he stopped I said, “Why, because I won’t be your beck and call girl?”
She hung up the phone after ordering a pile of Chinese food. It had been almost a week since the last time, the night when they had dinner with Jarrad, Tony, and the relative whose name she couldn’t remember, so if it was going to be a bad news night then she might at least have a dinner she’d enjoy. After checking her wallet for enough cash and checking the yard for Tyler, she took a deep breath and headed up to Jane’s room. She’d briefly pause outside the room before throwing herself in to get it over with.
2 cups (300 g ) plain flour
It will give us more time to work & get to know the neighbours.The most exciting thing all week will probably be going to Church a lot!
SPEAKERS TO INCLUDE:
Anti = Opposing
American Girl Doll Meetup
I've been in this absolute FUNK that I cannot shake. Hence the reason I have been MIA. I just have zero energy and feel depleted and unmotivated. I don't know if it is in response to the pneumonia from a month ago or what. I go back to the doc in a week for a follow up and new x-ray so we'll see.
Last summer one of my best friends gave birth to twin boys. Before that, she had asked me to paint their room. And so I did. We decided for a theme that wouldn't be just for babies, but one that, we hope, will look interesting to the boys until they go to school. Unfortunately the pictures are not good, but you will get an idea. The sure thing is I enjoyed it very much and hope the babies will live their first years in this room very happily.
Braided gold bracelet: Present from my friends
Christine Lagarde received promises of close to $800 million for the IMF’s firewall, but this will hardly be enough to stem a panic if first the Spanish government and then Portugal, Italy, Greece and others see their debt downgraded and bond yields rise to unsustainable levels. There will be a general stampede of investors out of Eurodebt.
Sometime back in January, Mike calls me and says, I think I have some bad news...I'm thinking, Oh shit, What?! And then he proceeds to tell me he's pretty sure I'd been called for Jury Duty.
4:00pm – Local Entertainment/Music etc
I do hope that, after a lengthy talk with his father, that W finally understands that giving an addict cash is not a smart thing to do. I have W's promise, that if he wants to help my son with something like a car repair, new set of tires, new shoes-- things that he needs-- that he could get the money to me, and I'd make sure it gets to where it's supposed to be. B has also agreed that he hands over his paychecks to me. I make sure his bills are paid. He seems relieved, as he says having cash isn't a good idea. He is very remorseful.
I managed to escape through one of the broken windows where I swam to a small island that was occupied entirely by seals. Thousands of them. Realising that I needed food to survive, I started looking for a broken tree branch which would enable me to kill one of the beasts before roasting it over a campfire.
Jesus changed His whole body posture to meet this man where he was.
Ethan has gotten soooo brave and is loving the super high tube slide from the top of the giant rocket...makes this mama a little nervous, but I suppose he's growing up and there's no stopping him! (This isn't it...he's just being silly on one of the little ones! Couldn't get a good pic inside the tunnel as he was whooshing down at lightning speed!)
Today, Wahhabism is the dominant Islamic tradition on the Arabian Peninsula; its influence is minor in the rest of the Middle East. Wahhabism is the dominant form of Islam in Saudi Arabia, which reportedly houses the largest population in the central region providence called Nejd. An exact size estimate of the Wahhabi population is a seemingly impossible figure to ascertain.
Congratulations !
The majority of the featured collections are available now on their website and I know that I will spend lots of late nights perusing online. I always do the most damage buying things when it's late. It's such a bad habit!
When the movement started I had hope against hope that the movement would succeed. In spite of all their faults, I personally feel Team Anna is sincere and have their hearts in the right place. So in my heart of hearts, I still hope they somehow miraculously succeed. But my head knows the truth. The writing on the wall is clear. ‘That’s all, folks. The show is over. It is time to pack up and head back home! Once again Sachin Tendulkar top scores in both innings but India loses yet another test match abroad. Once again democracy wins; the people lose. Life just goes on.”
I wonder who wove the pure flakelets?
Click "Read More" to see the lists of every show I played and performed, like you care...
I stop trying to explain myself
Whatever’s in her future, we’ll keep an eye out for her, because she’s only got one left.
There are a few things I'd like to improve this year:
Although Barley insists he knows nothing, and is suspicious about the place, Ned tells him the place is owned by the Ambassador, and proves it by letting Barley call the Ambassador from Ned's directory and asking him about when is the best time to play golf - as Ned correctly predicts, the Ambassador is engaged until 5:00. This proves to Barley that this whole thing isn't a joke.
I had run out of catnip-what could this be? I snatched up the bag and opened it. It was old dried oregano from my garden, with hardly any scent left to it! Heaven knows how long it had been sitting on the shelf, but probably Spring fever had awakened the Kitten Snuggles and she was begging for more!
The US drafts a constitution for Haiti, which notably excludes a provision from the country’s previous constitution which had prohibited foreign ownership of land. Under the US-drafted constitution, foreign investors would be able to purchase fertile areas and establish sugar cane, cacao, banana, cotton, tobacco, and sisal plantations. But the Haitian legislature finds the US-proposed constitution unacceptable and continues working on a new document which would reverse the terms of the 1915 treaty (see November 11, 1915), giving control of Haiti back to its own government, and which would leave the previous constitution’s land restrictions intact. When a copy of the document is sent to Washington, it is quickly rejected by the US State Department which complains that it is “unfriendly” and instructs that its passage be prevented.
At the beginning of the year you started reading and following the book 52 Small Changes with all your sisters over at the 'hood and I am happy to report that you made it through all 52 weeks and yes, you are happier because of it! You have made great changes to your life this year that you will carry through with you the rest of your life! Another wonderful thing you accomplished this year!
There just wasn’t a 33.
I'm very proud of my Studly Hubby - it takes a rare talent to take a new hobby to a professional level without any formal training (he also did this with his current career). I am inspired!
Liz Carmouche vs Ashleigh Curry
12/12/11 9:27 AM
We started our day at the Riflemans & Costume Parade which is a 2 hour fashion show of the Bavarian people's dress, bands, weaponry and of course beer. It was really cool to see all the different regions represented, the decorated lederhosen & dirndl and the huge horses pulling carts loaded with beer barrels.
67.363842 , 26.630384
Since I'm sure the gov't read this shit, get on it cap'n. I know you hate that "music" as much as the next soldier, so unleash the drones before it's too late! And, btw, HERE, just in case you need a reminder of how she has perfected the art of narcissism and age-ed crooning.
More than a million have been bought by South Africans.
In the flush of love’s light
Demick and Sluty make another long awaited return
Place the pans on a wire rack and cool for 20 minutes. Run a knife around the edges and turn the cakes out onto the rack and let cool completely.
Halldór Laxness' post-WWII satire The Atom Station has many parallels to the 2008 Kreppa (crisis/pinching) in Iceland. As the story begins the country is in turmoil, there are demonstrations in the streets, and foreign powers threaten Iceland's recently won independence. Ugla (the name translates as "owl") is a young woman from the rural north, who finds employment as a housekeeper at the home of Búi Árland: Businessman, Doctor of Philosophy and Member of Parliament. In Ugla's eyes Búi's wife and children are spoiled rotten, symptomatic of the degenerate modern life in the city. When asked as to why she is in Reykjavík, Ugla says that she has come "south" to learn how to play the harmonium for church services back home. As the story progresses, however, she reveals that her real longing is: ...to become a person, to know something, to be able to do something for myself... She takes "lessons" from a strange "organist" and his suspect circle of "friends." These lessons are as much about the way the world works as they are about music. Ugla also encounters a "cell" of Communists, further raising her awareness. Meanwhile, Búi hosts U.S. military men and members of parliament during negotiations to "sell the country" for an "atom station"- an event which did, in reality, lead to the existence of a U.S. military base in Keflavík for nearly sixty years.
I was not looking forward to making this cake. It looked like it was going to be cloyingly sweet, and I didn't think I'd ever be able to get rid of twelve pieces of way-too-sweet cake. But I ended up loving all the elements of the cake and could happily have eaten my way through the whole thing. If you too turned up your nose at this recipe and decided to pass it by, I implore you to give it a try.
1 Tablespoon pumpkin pie spice
The first night (Wednesday) was super fun at Mi Tierra’s. You would have thought that it was late night Saturday by the party people outside! Dancing in the street, live music, awesomeness.
“…a place to collaborate, cooperate & contribute to our collectively created experience… an opportunity to invent the world anew… to generate a culture… a connective environment… to be idealistic & celebratory… to have fun… this town may be temporary, but we hope the experience stays with you… this is an invent rather than an event…”
“So let me get this right, CoCo? A 5 lb. bag of sugar costs less than $2.20. . .and the reason why I know this is because I bought a 5 lb. bag of sugar a time or two. So two twenty minus one fifty-nine is what?. . .Sixty-one cents?”
The tempers are on edge; tired of the snow, the cold, the wind. Business is slow in the in-between and a trip down below can illicit seasonal envy looking at the blooms and blossoms and green that may be still a month off here, barring a major storm. Deep winter and its way of inducing cabin fever dose not test one's mettle the way the April does.
As I listened, I wished to see this world with my own eyes.
1. Create a makeshift wand from lemongrass or burdock root and wave it over the problem area.
Faythe Levine
Construction firms: Tooles/Clark – a joint venture of Tooles Contracting Group of Detroit and Clark Construction Company of Lansing.
When the sponsored lifters finished it was time for the woman of honor to show her skills. Brian, Chelsi’s trainer and owner of the gym, strapped Chelsi’s legs to the bench. With several men and women of incredible size and strength surrounding her and shouting encouragement, Chelsi lifted more weight than I ever had, and she did it several times. It was a bit touch-and-go at one point, but the roaring of her fellow weight-room warriors urged her on.
From a Lighthouse Trails reader (who spent years as a missionary in Latin America) who sent the following letter to Tom White of Voice of the Martyrs and gave us permission to post this. We do so as we share this reader’s concern over the direction that VOM appears to be taking:
I myself have been living with Chronic Pain for over 12 years now. (or should I say "trying to live with") because anyone who has chronic pain knows - it is almost impossible to live a normal life anymore. The life that you previously knew (& lived) is NO MORE...
Keep those contributions for yourselves MCA, we need an end to APARTHEID,and would prefer an END TO APARTHEID above ALL contributions.
Gee, Penny. Ya think?
In paradise.
But it means I can easily read the text to accompany the illustrations - and the articles as well.
When they get there, St. Peter says,
... and no one gets hurt!
Do I smell a Nita Hanson book deal? A frivolous lawsuit, like the one that some black Rutgers women basketball players filed against Don Imus?
I had the weirdest dreams last night.
The instrumental bonus tracks all make for great listening. And sense we mentioned Madlib in this post -- is he actually hoping for more remixes and samples? One thing that hasn't been mentioned in these posts is that, in a big way, Marcos Valle is more valorized outside Brazil than within it, where is almost forgotten except for his bigger hits. In a lot ways he was either ahead of his time, or just 'out of time', existing in some weird alternate musical universe. I am aware that these write-ups have perhaps begun leaning towards the breathless prose of idyllic idol praise but, damnit, this album really IS probably a masterpiece. It is nothing if not masterful, and it makes it all sound so easy - as if blending sun-dappled soul music with post-bossa pop, mild psychedelia (as in, about five or six hours into a psychedelic experience..), and rock attitude is just something they guys could do with a shrug or the casual nonchalance displayed in the back cover photos.
I’m pretty impressed with the One S battery. Around the mid-way point of testing I had a bad feeling. The phone displayed about a quarter of juice in the little battery icon, but it lasted another two hours or so. I’m thinking the icon itself is off, to be honest with you.
TTC was SURE Steve Carell would take it. Shocked.
Always love a good contemporary YA, and though I wasn't quite expecting to love this one, it's starting to grow on me and I'll be curious to see how I feel by the time I'm done.
4. Gareth Bale (Tottenham Hotspur)
Serve with shredded lettuce, sour cream, cheese and squeeze of lime (optional).
You can add a status which goes on as a thought / moment; you can share this with your Path friends, keep it private or auto-post to the rest of your web presence.
♥~All entries will be verified.
Revolution Wheels manufacture all types of wheels for both historic and modern motorsport events, ranging from 10 inch all the way through the range to the new, ultra lightweight Millennium II 18 inch wheels which are suitable for everything from Production cars to Super 2000 and World Rally Cars.
This weekend has mostly been characterised by me being ill :-( Boo! I've had a bad cough that I just couldn't shake but after a few days in bed - I'm now feeling much better! Woop!!
With this template being free of charge we do not provide the photoshop file to edit any parts your self, just the template, and coding. If you would like to receive the photoshop file a fee of £5 must be paid.
truffle oil, to taste
100. China Syndrome-Nothings Not Worth Knowing (Self-Released)
Album track ‘The Art of Life’ seems to be speaking about the band and its fans and the 30-plus hiatus between albums, quoting Oscar Wilde: “Life’s too important to be taken seriously”. And Blueprint, like many ‘comeback’ albums by classic bands has that ‘serious fun’ vibe about it, with all youthful ego trips banished with childhood’s toys.
Khrusostom eyed him skeptically. “Tell me she’s actually an acquaintance of yours and not just someone you’ve spotted with a heaving bosom.”
But to return to Steerforth Books, I feel quietly optimistic about the business. The sales are growing steadily every week and, by Easter, I think I'll have reached a level where the profits provide a reasonable income.
SueAnn
Of those, the person usually held primarily responsible for the attempted railroading of the three members of the Duke Lacrosse team who were charged with a crime that never happened, was the local district attorney, Michael Nifong, who was subsequently disbarred in June 2007 following a series of ethical and prosecutorial abuse he committed in relation to this case . These abuses included the issuing of numerous prejudicial, guilt presuming and misleading statements to the press regarding the accused, he effectively took control of the case, and allegedly persuaded the local Durham police to violate their own identification processes to assist the accuser in identifying lacrosse players as her attackers, after she had failed to do so on a number of occasions. (the police only included pictures of lacrosse players in the photographs shown to the accuser, and she was told this, so she knew there were no wrong answers).
1 status
-Mix the all purpose flour in 1/4 cup of milk,add into the remaining milk mix.
I am impressed that the film is in isiZulu, with English subtitles. I am also impressed by profiles of the award-winning and vastly experienced crew.
Like Facebook.
There are two depressing things about this trailer
A girl's voice rang out above the screams of the crowd. Sam turned to see her older sister, Abby, darting across the field. She was still wearing her white fencing uniform. The first place medal she'd won earlier bounced against her chest, flashing gold in the sun.
The Old Testament and New Testament combined show us the love and mercy of Jesus Christ. Many times people say that the Old Testament is full of war stories, killings and murder. That statement shows that they never really read the Bible for all it’s worth. Many times, we see God pleading with Israel to stop what they are doing and follow Him, however, Israel decided to leave God. We also see many times where God states that He will hold back His discipline if Israel repents and returns to God. So if the Old Testament is just a series of war stories, then why do we see mercy, love and grace?
Renewal in spirit, mind, vision.
He was born in 1931 in the USA. He was a soldier, then a lawyer, and then a political adviser to President Nixon. In this role he was the “hatchet man” – the one who would get things done, whatever it took. He was a key figure in the Watergate scandal that ended Nixon’s presidency in 1974. At age 41 he became a Christian. His conversion was met with widespread cynicism. The next year he went to jail for his crimes in Watergate. Impacted by what he saw of life behind bars he started a prison ministry called Prison Fellowship upon his release, which now ministers to inmates all around the world. His impact for the cause of Christ through Prison Fellowship has been massive.
These visits are not long enough
Died on the 5th instant, at his residence … Mr. Isaac Draucker, aged 45 years.
He wears $5,000 tailored suits, $500 Egyptian cotton shirts, the finest Italian leather shoes. The average Sea Org Member gets his or her uniform supplied, if they are lucky. If they want any other clothing, say something nice to wear on that rare day off, they have to buy it themselves. And if they want underwear, socks, toiletries, any other personal items, they have to buy those things themselves too. Out of their 40 cents an hour.
-”He was recording his name on it, I was ……..”
menopause?
that have been devastated for generations.
This series is informative, and welcome - but it also says more than it perhaps intends about the current state of the "canon" for British poetry readers: it is solid, safe, traditional - and all-too-willing to overlook whatever is not exceptionally mainstream; little place for the maverick, or the marginal. That being said, these are all poets to love, and let's have more of them.
Hey - I've never felt somethin's so strong - oh no
The point is we have all seen very young children do both at the same time!
The faux resin charm bracelet was made several years ago for my daughter. Using a thermal process, I encased photos of her and myself as children on both sides of the charms along with meaningful text.
As we sipped tea, I shared with the girls. The girls cooed over the idea of teenage sex and younger men. My chair moaned against the floor, as I stood up. Breadsticks, tea glasses and chatter all stopped clanking. He had stolen the table with his presence.
We spent some time tracing the Bakerloo Line, and some time on the 6 route, and passed the Roger Gracie Academy of Brazilian Jujitsu (no, nor did we…) Then we were back on familiar territory as we went down Ladbroke Grove and over the canal, where we just glimpsed some passing boats. Then we were into the car park for ‘Sylvia’s Sainsbury’s’. From the bus, we could not see the memorial garden to the dead of the Paddington Railway disaster of 1999 though we know it’s there somewhere. We looped round St Charles’ Hospital, where Sylvia spent a few weeks in the 1990s. I’m sure it’s cleaner now than it was then: it is impossible to imagine it being dirtier…
Graham crackers
Anyway, once that's done they take that hose out and then stick another different hose up there that has a fiber optic camera in it. It has a little headlight on it too; and what it lights up is shore nuff red, like I've been saying, and shiny, too. Theres all these little red spidery veins all over the place. To tell the truth though, it pretty much looks like guts. Or one of those party balloons that are all lumpy and are about 2 ft long? If one of those was big enough to walk inside of, and the inside was all covered with wet spar varnish, and was red, and had scary eyeball veins, then that's exactly what it looks like.
Gaelic for Christmas, Nollaig is another Williams brothers crazy invention this time incorporating hand picked spruce tips and high impact specialist hops. So kind of like a Christmas tree IPA then. It's very limited edition.
el jimador silver tequila, lime, basil, serrano pepers
“There will be a two-stage process; it’s just not physically possible to do all of this in one step. I know the president is worried about his next election. But my God, shouldn’t he be worried about the country? We have got a budget deficit of $1.5 trillion. We’re borrowing 42 cents on every dollar we spend, we have $14.5 trillion national debt. It is time to get serious about stopping the spending here in Washington, D.C.” — Speaker of the House John Boehner on Fox News
Uttarā said:
But He ain't listening to me
We stopped riding together when Poseidon had his nervous breakdown and for three years my only contact with Amalia was when I had to wait for her to eat in the morning, try to carry her in the evenings, or find her somewhere on the wring side of the fence. A friend of mine, Janis, started training show jumping with her. I was completely lost in trying to save Poseidon’s life.
Wall Street sponsored clown show
And everybody knows that you live forever
But what about an idea? How do you protect that?
Midweek I had my review appointment with a counsellor and it seemed to go well. I did go through a few of the same questions my doctor asked, but that's to be expected and not a big worry. I did clam up and then the tears came suddenly when I was asked....
Oh, we watch scenes tick by in typical Allen Disastersploitation fashion; such as "The Carefully Crawling Over A Dangerous Drop Scene", "The Fiery Explosions Endangering Huge Crowds Scene", "The Scaling Inch By Inch Over A Certain Death Firepit/Rocky Cavern/Snake Pit Scene" "The Scene That Has Something Dangerous To Do With Water Scene", "The Lovers Who Aren't Sure If They'll See Each Other Again Scene", "The Angry Boss/Company President Who Won't Believe The Facts That Something Dangerous Is Going To Happen Scene"... there's a lot of these scenes peppered throughout this thing. I think they're a prerequisite, seeing how often every Irwin Allen flick has 'em.
1) They’ve toned down the spell effects a lot. A lot. It was amazing to throw axes through a fire wall whilst fighting alongside 10-20 other people and still be able to tell exactly which flaming axes were mine.
Meanwhile, a few blocks north, nuns from the Sisters of the Holy Cross had set up a parochial school next door to St. Mary’s Church (now Cathedral). Their first home was a two-room cabin, one room serving as “parlor, classroom, study hall, recreation room, music hall, assembly room, as well as refectory and sewing room. The other room was used as kitchen, dormitory, pantry, and store room.” That must have been quite a cabin.
But, The Bearded One needs to take his medicine.
Walking back to my car after the awards ceremony, I was stopped by a couple that said they had seen me running around town. Of course, they thought I was nuts at first, but after a few minutes of answering their questions, they were intrigued and ready to look into it more.
Are you a sugar addict? Do you have fatigue on a regular basis that you use coffee, caffeine and sugar laden foods to help you overcome? Do you get cranky and irritable when you are hungry? How about frequent migraines, or sinusitis? Do you find yourself grabbing for the chocolate or Twinkies when your Aunt Flo arrives for her monthly visit? If so, you more than likely have some form of a sugar addiction.
How does that body-clock stuff work?
1 ivory
I stood in front of the bathroom mirror, applying concealer to cover up my fresh bruises; angry hand prints marked my arms, several bruises and cuts painted across my face. I could hear Jack shuffling around in the other room, getting ready for work. He was leaving late today, I had to make sure to keep out of his way, make sure not to upset him further. I winced as I headed down the stairs to eat my yogurt and make a list of things to be done that day. Jack had barely said a word all morning and I would have missed him heading out the front door had he not grunted, “Stew for supper,” and I quickly added cook stew to my list.
I will follow the road to where it goes. Follow its every curve and mystery. Not pining for knowledge about its end, just content to walk the road and take in the landscape as it unfolds.
I am having a little trip next week with some friends to Harrogate to the Parchment Exhibition. My poor hubby has volunteered to drive the minibus - don't think he realised what he was letting himself in for taking 16 ladies on a craft trip. They have all promised me they will behave and look after him !!!!!!!! LOL.
The only time you wore them at School was for P.E.
Red: DR5
And the winner of our Top Chef honors is Colleen who created this super cute card using Easter Joy! I love how she used the white liquid applique on the sheep heads to make them 'puffy'! Colleen will be joining with the sketch crew for TESC157 and we'll learn more about her then!
1161. Apple in My Car (Northeast Bound, KY) 10:13 a.m.
Even in the less attractive colours in the female version of these birds plumage holds subtle and beautiful different tones which are soft on the eye. I love the appealing olive colour of the female Malachite Sunbirds feathers in some of the photos. I shot these photos with my Sony DH 9 which has a relatively high pixel count and this allowed me to then digitally zoom into some of the colours for a closer look without losing too much quality. I sit quite close to the feeders and the birds don’t seem to mind me being there as they sap up the sugar water. Other birds which I’ve seen drinking the water are the Drongos, Bulbuls, White Eye’s and the Weavers. The latter being the most bullish of all the birds and they constantly attack the softer natured sunbirds.
One is particularly horrified at the lack of statistics that could give the extent of this unprecedented destruction of women, due largely to the scarcity of funding for carrying out such grim tallies: “There is a natural tendency to want to know how extensive a problem sexual violence is in order to properly address it. However, the assessment team felt strongly that scarce funding should not be used at this time to try to determine total numbers of cases, victims, and survivors. Such studies can be carried out later if necessary, based on dossiers kept by human rights organizations, hospitals, NGOs, and other groups.”
ME: Yes, I'm sorry about that. I understand. I was very busy, end of the evening and all, and I tried to bring water as often as a I could. I'm sorry that it wasn't up to par...but I was very busy and did the best that I could. I understand that you said that your "tip reflected the service?"
7. Death at a Funeral – A black comedy beyond compare. Hysterical.
Since sugar became a household commodity in the 18th Century, sugar consumption has increased from four pounds per person annually to 180 pounds annually for half the American population. HFCS use has increased over ten thousand percent since its introduction into processed foods and beverages in the 1970s.
For all the fun that running a surf lodge is, the bottom line is that the guests were with us to go surf, see some beaches and then relax with a few beers in the evening. It just wasn’t the same mission as ours, and the odd guest that came to stay who would join my classes and would get up early to see the sunrise just highlighted what we could be doing.
Okay, so first of all, both of these books are SO TINY and SO CUTE.
I did line my sheet pan with aluminum foil and also placed foil around the bottom of the springform pan. I did not add in the raisins either or the pine nuts. I did not think my husband would have eaten it if I had but I did of course, add in the dark rum which is a MUST.
on board” , to off-set some of the costs, and/or completely pay for the team with (possible)
I was so surprised. It felt odd, and oddly comforting, to be recognized by an ethnic group that obviously I am tied to by ancestry but not much else.
his life struggles dealt with coming to terms with who he wanted to be
A car stalling after being driven a short distance can be caused by a variety of faults with the engine. Start by checking there is no debris in the fuel line. If it is clear, check the vacuum pipes and hoses on the intake manifold and also check all grounding wires. If none of these approaches solves the problem, it could be that the fuel pump itself is faulty, causing low delivery pressure to the injectors.
This year we made Santas covered in both milk chocolate and white chocolate. We called them “Utah Santas” (this is where Santa will get snow on his boots) and “Florida Santas” (this is where Santa will get mud on his boots).
(+/- 90 min)
Now let’s have the candidates introduce themselves to Florida voters.
I'm tired of hearing the word accident. I wouldn't call it an on-purpose but a lot of them certainly seem preventable.
Where the hell has common sense gone in this mad world?
Believing that the Bible is the word of God, I further believe that homosexuality is wrong in the eyes of the Lord. The Bible says that it is an “abomination” in more than one place, in both the Old and New Testaments. I want to make sure, before going any further, that my position on this is clear. I think, based on my religious beliefs, that homosexuality is a sin.
Ibiza, it’s the island everyone talks about during summer….but not for relaxing in sunshine, but rather getting’ SMASHED BEYOND YOUR LIMITS IN IT!!
You get a book of collected poems and think you have everything by that poet. But the new Philip Larkin, The Complete Poems edited by Archie Burnett is the penultimate book that every Larkin fan (and even those not totally familiar with his poetry) will want to have in his or her library. In fact, Burnett points out in his
25.01.82 Brighton Top Rank
Here's a brand new design all completed! It's a mystery for a few more days but here's a partial photo of the finished design.
Duh. No brainer this one. Unless you know 100% for sure that your mate the solicitor does criminal law and is good at it, ask for the Duty Solicitor. They certainly do criminal law and they are good at it. Then listen to what the solicitor says and do it. Their job is to get you off without the Cops or CPS laying a glove on you if at all possible. It is what they get paid for. They are free to you. There is no down side. Now decent folks think it makes them look like they have something to hide if they ask for a solicitor. Irrelevant. Going into an interview without a solicitor is like taking a walk in Tottenham with a big gold Rolex. Bad things are very likely to happen to you. I wouldn’t do it and I interview people for a living.
More heroes joined their ranks, including the likes of Spider-Man, the Thing, and Wolverine. Some times, the roster had grown so big it was confusing, and they caused more harm then good with their massive numbers. In order to better manage the team they were broken down into a small team with several sub groups, like the New Avengers, West Coast Avengers, and the Secret Avengers. To be asked to join this team is considered by everyone in the Marvel universe as the biggest honor any hero can achieve. It means they have stood against countless foes and can hold their own alongside the rest of Earth’s mightiest heroes.
I wore: Trousers - Primark Boots - Clarks Top - Dorothy Perkins Pendant - Top Shop
new front door
General Najiya: (General Najiya goes near Anwaar. He holds Anwaar’s right hand with his right hand. He seems like he’s going to embrace his daughter. Then he hits her with his left hand. Anwaar is lying down unconscious on the ground. General Najiya puts Anwaar’s hands behind her back and begins to tie her.) I’m sorry my child, blood cannot save your life.
Rauschenberg’s vision of gift giving changed art forever. For not only did he give, he received in a wonderful way. Rauschenberg’s inspired collaboration with people like Cage, Susan Weil, Merce Cunningham, Steve Paxton, Jean Tinguely, Jasper Johns, Cy Twombly, Willem De Kooning, and even Dante (that’s a small fraction of the collaborations just in the 50s) led to a sea change in art making -- a festival of allowances, amendments, and multi-disciplinary experiments that affects everything serious in art today. I will let all the competent critics around the country way in on this fact. You will find a compendium of them here.
For the past two winter seasons I have taught at Falls Creek Primary School. It's a tiny little school at one of the ski resorts in Victoria. There is currently 5 kids attending the school, but over the winter season, when people move up to ski, the enrolments increase to 40. So the teaching staff goes from 1 to 4. Last yeah I was lucky enough to work there full time for 6 months, there were more kids over summer.
(Rae said to put tennis 2 balls in with the mat, yet I did not have any, so I put in a pair of little person shoes, don't do that! the mat got all kinds of bumps on it, they gave it texture though and it still came out lovely)
And the best part is that you have your hands free to take photos while you're walking to your next photoshoot.
Where to bring your books: There’s a box for your donations at the Oak Tree Centre in Lightmoor. We promise that you’ll get a big thank you and a smile for donating them. You’ll also be able to bring along books on the
I just started digging out some gardens to plant the Three sisters, a traditional triad of plants grown in many places on the North American continent. It's a fantastic technique for growing a survival garden, that is something you can actually feed yourself off of with minimal work and land use. The plants help each other as per the principles of companion planting. The corn stalks grow tall, providing a trellis for the beans to grow up, while the beans add nitrogen to the soil that the corn requires, and the squash and/or pumpkin plants grow vines and large leaves that shelter the soil from the sun to keep water in, and repel pests.
It is easy to name who is responsible for the continuity errors. Director Stuart Baird had never seen an episode of TNG when he agreed to direct Nemesis. Word has it he kept referring to LeVar Burton as Laverne, which may explain why Burton has publicly stated he hates the film. (Troi’s sexual assault may explain Sirtis’ frank assessment.) It is never a good thing to hand over a project with years of continuity and an army of dedicated, nitpicking fans over to someone completely unaware of what has gone before.
For a practical application of this, see for example Tom Owad’s application for identifying subversives on Amazon via their wishlists using a bot that queries the site. A mashup combining this with photo recognition technologies would be relatively straightforward and itself could be combined and recombined endlessly with other mashups to provide a much sharper slice of someone’s life than is now visible through even the most invasive state database systems in the world.
Perhaps, but some say it’s all for naught if you haven’t first tackled the way you think!
sultry train sensually
Christmas presents are always wonderful to receive, but how about getting some, halfway through the year? My friends didn’t mail them all to me, because the weight of the box was going to make it really expensive to mail. So, they let me know that there were a few waiting for me, here in the U.S. And now that I’m back in Pennsylvania, Rachel (yes, my friend’s name is Rachel) pulled them down from a shelf closet for me.
1994, even preMartha Stewart talking about it!
152Come thou, my father, brother, husband, friend!
Students, on edline, if you have questions, please ask Shea.
Length of the road: 48 km
I got some of this fab fluffy stuff at the craft show and couldn't wait to have a wee play! I love it!
Add other ingredients and cook on low heat for about 20-30 minutes
The film has been directed by Robert Rodriguez – what do you think it is about Robert that makes him a good director?
Even in a rather down year, the GOP has a wealth of talent and ideas to offer to contrast to the tired and old partisanship and personal attacks that President Obama is offering, and Mitt Romney has connected with voters and fought a national and organized campaign to take a solid and commanding primary lead. This is the narrative, based on an analysis of the resumes of his opponents and the delegate math in comparison to other primaries, and this is the narrative that the media is refusing to tell because of its sloppy reporting, personal bias, and lack of quality research.
7. Losing my Mum.
I usually leave a comment for others to take this one with a grain of salt perhaps.
After the game Grandiose and Frisuer had agreed that they all needed a nap before heading off for dinner later that evening. After a couple of hours Grandiose texted me to let me know that he was up and ready to go without any further delay. So the whole group of us headed off to a local Mexican restaurant, Hacienda, for dinner. We ate, talked, and did a lot of catching up over a great meal. Afterwards we headed out to do some shopping for some Notre Dame apparel that they are unable to find in the area in which they live. Once we had shopped till the stores closed, we headed back and parted ways so we could all get some sleep after a very active and busy day.
here is a picture of a dove with some baby bunnies.
WHAT: It’s me. Really, that is all I need to say, here. It’s me in one of those artist silently and serenely posing in order to render a silent and serene portrait. It’s me looking all artist-like. But I actually AM an artist…not like one. AND that’s me. Up there. In that square…I mean, rectangle. I did that. That’s me.
I take that back. No struggle- I've just been making crappy choices whenever I feel like it. I've made minimal effort and haven't really thought about my choices. So no struggle- just bad choices.
hatred
It had 3 narrators, which was a bit confusing at times, but I still liked all of them.
So he returned to Slavia Prague (renamed Dynamo Prague by the Communist regime) were he stayed until he retired from playing in 1955 at the age of 42. He took up a coaching career with some success managing Dynamo among others. Never happy under Communist rule, he lost most of his wealth during these years and retired altogether in the 1970′s and returned to Prague.
Belt from Saks Fifth Avenue Off Fifth
The two substitute censored versions he submitted to the Fringe are below:
Dip: 1 cup fat-free sour cream 4 tsp crumbled blue cheese
01 Something Outside
Here's a little lesson for you in how pension fund managers operate. They invest in companies because they are profitable and that is all they should be considering. Just yesterday we see one of those you - in your financial wisdom - decide is a bad investment doing rather well, for example.
The Lodger
2) We teach worldview through the study of history.
First of all, the segment could be postponed indefinitely, should any “real” news develop.
Yusef Komunyakaa, The Chameleon Couch
Arena 24: Interestingly enough, I think that Tsumugi and Ikaros may be a close match than originally perceived. Both of them have a movie that continues to give them some staying power. While a movie sometimes does not help characters that much, Ikaros should have a bit more power than Tsumugi given that her movie was more widespread having it subbed and all. I think that Ikaros will be the victor of this one, but Tsumugi may prove to be a wall hard to penetrate with her K-On! supporters.
For one thing, he might try reading both of these holy books he’s just learned about, and try to decide whether one or other of them really is the word of the all-powerful creator of the Universe. He might try to reach a decision about this by examining what’s written in these books, and the claims they make for these religions, and doing his best to determine which one (at a minimum) of the two was most probably made up by some humans in a more primitive society, who were struggling to understand the world and whose lack of modern knowledge shows through in what we now see as misconceptions in their writings. Presumably, any text actually inspired by an omnipotent and omniscient deity would look decidedly different from that.
Devan Hibbard
So what would a more appropriate federal rule achieve? Some important things, I think.
I could just say... "Well, my kids are passing their CAT tests each year and thats good so if it's not broken, why fix it?" I could say that, right? They are learning but I can't agree that is enough.
As the geological and astronomical records converge, the match between climate and supernova rates gets better and better, with high rates bringing icy times.
6) Sandwich the remaining 200 g (7 oz) butter between 2 sheets of baking parchment or greaseproof paper and tap with a rolling pin until softened to the same consistency as the détrempe. Form the butter into a square about 2 cm (3/4 inch) thick.
There are two great things about that. First, when an officer comes to court to testify against you, he gets paid between $200-$300 extra. When he has to respond to a TWD request, he doesn't get paid anything extra. And since the last thing any officer wants is more paperwork, a high percentage of times they just blow it off entirely.
They are playing a twin bill as we speak and I am not attending. I was painting my dad’s house while the boys visited grandma and grandpa. I haven’t even tuned in to the USA world cup match. I warned my dad about Boetang! He can play. 1-nill Ghana on a Boetang strike. Methinks Ghana will advance to the quarts so our topping England in the group was our big takeaway. I hope I’m wrong.
Realising a simple restoration wasn’t possible I erased the drive from Disk Utility and then checked the disk for errors, none were reported. This was good news as it appeared the disk was physically ok. I then ran the Snow Leopard installation and attempted a restoration from Time Machine. Once again this failed. I then used Disk Utility to check the Time Machine drive and it found errors, which were corrected.
her creative writing class, led by a charismatic new teacher who encourages students to be true to themselves. But who is Paige, if not the homecoming princess everyone expects her to be? In this arresting and witty debut, a girl who was once high-school royalty must face a truth that money and status can't fix, and choose between living the privileged life of a princess, or owning up to her mistakes and giving up everything she once held dear.
But the industry executives gathered at SAE, many of whom are directly responsible for delivering propulsion systems that are reliable, efficent and cheap, said they are worried that regulatory demands on manufacturers to reduce fossil-fuel pollution don't take into account the difficulty of persuading consumers to give up the power, convenience and comparatively low upfront buying costs of internal-combustion engines.
She’s not there
Part 3: The fleeing dandy finds a home
Which brings us to that third wannabeatnik from my opening. Yep, it's January 26th, and that's my father's birthday. And for about as long as I've been Grave as Peter about loving the movies, I've known that Roger Heuck has been a big fan of A THOUSAND CLOWNS. When MGM finally released it to burn-on-demand DVD in 2011, I asked for it as a Christmas gift, and I think he was not only quite pleased to buy it for me, he was probably a little jealous that he couldn't hold onto it for a wee bit longer after I left home with my copy. I don't know for certain if he saw it when the film emerged from that near-year's worth of editing by Gardner and Rosenblum to an triumphant reception in December 1965, or maybe a little bit later on, but between conversations about the film in particular and his youth in general, I can well fathom that this one has stuck with him because it had a resonance with that young man who hadn't yet fathomed my existence.
Father nailed it. Nearly forty years later I hadn't thought of gaming God until Father brought it up. Now I am in the position of trying to think of how I can make up for that. Is God upset that we game Him?
To set against the excesses of the Inquisition, there’s a lot here about the birth of modern navigation, the advances in science and having Christopher Columbus as a character in the story means that we know that at least one plot strand will end happily. How Breslin leads Zarita and Saulo through to their respective fates makes for a really exciting, fast-moving and very enjoyable novel.
Mid March, John called Jim, Donna, Diane and myself to let us know he was planning a trip to Vegas to see Rich. He had a 'feeling' if he didn't go he might never see Rich again. And of course, he also wanted to see Deb. At the time of the phone call, I wasn't at all sure I'd be able to go but both Jim and Diane said 'yes'. I was determined I would do all I could to go too. This was about the time I started to sell wholesale in a group on Face Book and I was getting orders like crazy. I was afraid I was in over my head, but I did it and was putting my earnings aside for the trip. Within 2 weeks, I had money for my airfare and made my plane reservation. By mid April I had enough saved up for food. John and Jim made plans to stay at the Gold Coast Casino and Deb had room for me, Diane and Donna in her apartment. Three days before I left, my three daughters handed me some cash for an early Mother's Day gift so that I could gamble if I wanted to, or see some shows.
I seem to remember in the last David Tennant episode of Doctor Who, the Time Lords decided that it would be a great idea to end time itself.
After all, it had two drawers, and three shelves, so all it needed was a little bit of cuteness.
On a conference call with reporters earlier this week, Rep. Darrell Issa expressed concern that the damage F&F has caused to U.S.-Mexico relations will be all but irreparable. It looks like his concern is well placed. Issa said it’s especially frustrating to be unable to share information with the Mexican government because the Department of Justice will not share the information with Congress in the first place.
It was SUCH a blessing, this home, these Landlords we have, the location everything about it has been a HUGE blessing from a loving Father in Heaven who knew our situation and our needs and blessed us more than we could have asked for.
Faler recently finished a chandelier for the DeCordova Museum that is made out of wax. Over time, the chandeliers deteriorate and Faler has to go and restock them for longevity.
Bishop Lifting Products, Inc. (BLP), a fabricator and distributor of slings and rigging supplies, has announced the opening of a new regional office in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma.
Ahoy Mateys!
More!
radiation clouds have often driven me indoors away bearing witness from the insanity, and mother earth beckons me outside,
♥ 1 cup packed brown sugar
Now I knew how I could make a pumpkin stem! Modge Podge and brown paper! Back to the thrift store I went and there was my light globe patiently waiting for me. A whole Twenty-five cents later, I was on my way to a pumpkin!
Her mother.
And an interesting article by CanadianBusiness from today entitled
Coriander Seeds - 1/2 tsp
Then, serendipity struck after I drafted the beginning of this post. August McLaughlin wrote a post on her blog about Cinderella. Normally, I would’ve included her in my Friday Favorites post last week, but I knew I would be posting this and it fit right in. She looks at Cinderella as a metaphor. She muses that we all have a little Cinderella in us. It really is a beautiful concept, not to mention the wonderful song she includes.
XII.
So then we gathered up examples of Escher's pictures and looked at them. In the library we found a few other books with similar styles but directed at children. My favorites were Switching on the Night and Imagine a Place.
Myth #5 - WANTED posters
Not even death can take away.
The City Council is holding a public hearing today (Wednesday, May 2, 10:00 a.m.) to discuss a batch of bills which seem intended to drastically limit the capability of the Landmarks Preservation Commission (LPC) to do their job of preserving landmarks.
Significant Victory
Ailes (an oddly controlling obsessive in the Howard Hughes mode) has featured in several of The Slog postings in this series. They include examples of Ailes spying on employees, accessing their phone records, and firing employees – followed by million-dollar payments after they accused him of getting them to lie to the FBI. But these latest allegations go much further.
But is there any objective basis for evaluating when we are following the direction of the Spirit and when we are gratifying the desires of the flesh? Paul obviously thinks so. Having described in general terms the Spirit’s victory over the sinful nature, he does define their specific characteristics in a list of the acts of the sinful nature (vv. 19-21) and a list of the fruit of the Spirit (vv. 22-23). These specific lists of vices and virtues are not offered as a new set of specific codes to replace the law codes. Rather, they provide an objective basis for evaluation, so we can determine whether we are living to gratify the desires of the sinful nature or living by the Spirit.
Van Damme plays douchebag Chad and asshole Alex. Chad and Alex are the twin sons separated at birth as their parents, who have played an integral role in the construction of the tunnel connecting China and Hong Kong. Their parents are murdered in a plot to gain exclusive control of the revenue from the tunnel, but a nanny rescues Alex and a bodyguard Frank (Geoffrey Lewis) rescues Chad before they are shot as well.
life slows its pace
know me, know me not,
For Onion Bhaji
Yes, the nation is proud of Pacquiao. He has given tremendous honor to the country. But, that is how far as the comparison goes.
Yeah, that one bore repeating.
At its first meeting of spring quarter, the Faculty Senate heard presentations about three well-established Stanford programs that offer online courses, and on the university’s newest online courses, which are available free from Coursera.
Fourth, the Seller wants to maximize their bottom line, so along these lines, the standard fees most Sellers will pay is natural hazard report and county transfer taxes. If you ask for a home warranty, then that reduces the Seller’s net income; you might consider buying that yourself. In addition on an REO, the Seller will often pay the CLTA title fees if you use their recommended title/escrow company. This saves them time and money because that title company already has a history with that property.
I love the idea of a group of people gathering with positive intentions in a peaceful way to achieve wellness. I like the idea of yoga for the same reasons I like the idea of observing the Sabbath. When you remove the religion and culture from both, the basic goal of each are pure in nature and focus on gathering with like minded people to pay resect to yourself and those around you. Both practices can be easily translated to our current life situation and both allow practitioners to slow down, unplug and get back to basics. All of this is what I need more of in my life, but the challenge is being able to contain the feeling I have during a yoga class and translate it to my life in general.
I just wanted to pop by to announce our new Design Team but first of all i want to say a great big
Regnans mumbled something about hamadryads and their pride, then proclaimed in a slightly louder voice to the tree, “We must be sober, be vigilant, because the shadow walks about like a roaring lion, seeking whom it may devour.”
Anyway, best listen to the seminar I’m in about ‘Best Value Technology’…
ii ) disclosure of the physical location of call center employees unless they are located in the United States, and
Sometimes when people want to be friends with me I think “really? me?” and can’t quite believe it. But that’s not what I want to write about.
As usual, it sounds like the synths from Sonic The Hedgehog 2 have come to life and are now stalking you through a jungle made out of soup... but that's what we're all really looking for in music, aren't we? Name your price below:
Notes from the Gean 3:4 March 2012
His snide remarks to Dennis Skinner, a long serving MP, showed further disdain for someone who has sat in more sessions of Parliament than Dave has had hot dinners (not just dinners with Murdoch, but all kinds of powerful people who are all in it together).
Level 4: MP Cost: 20, Damage: 206%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 4% chance to stun the enemy for 1 seconds.
Until we know more, I will feel this heaviness upon me.
I don’t know how many birthdays I have celebrated in Montana. birth-4, 6, 8, 10, 12, 14, 16, 17, almost 28–I guess almost half of them. And the other half were probably at Lake Tahoe. With a little Phoenix (3 years?) and Seattle in there. And birthday in Montana is not really a THING. We just visited extended family every other year when I was growing up. And my mom got summers off, so that’s when we’d go. And my birthday is in the middle of summer. So there you have it.
brittle beauty - might this be the last?
4. Portland, OR (Powell's Books)
Am attaching a couple pics. One is of my lovely bike, (which i've decided needs a name, i'm gonna have to think on that), one is a picturesque farm right off the bikepath and the last is just some clouds i thought were pretty. hope you enjoy them!
It is obvious to everyone that YES the Prime Minister would benefit from the 5p tax cut. So why doesnt he just come out and admit to it. Because then we would not all be”in this together”… would we?
I’ve loved Liquid Ambers since I was a girl helping my Nan rake the leaves under the tall specimen in her back yard. We have six on our block, including one with varigated leaves that my son Pip gave me for Christmas a couple of years ago, and I’m hoping to add a few more before Spring.
Not much, Annie replied with a shake of her head. He’s two years ahead of me. We took biology together last year, but that’s it.
She closed the front door quietly so as not to disturb the sleeping child and walked toward the barn. Ralph saw her coming and ran down the hill toward her. The farm always seemed to take at least five years off Ralph’s life, and he leaped and bounded toward her like a puppy. At one point, he stopped to grab a stick in his mouth and rushed toward her to play fetch. Rachel pulled the stick out of his jaws and tossed it toward George, waiting at the barn.
Live Oak Treehugger- the 3 year old Barley Wine that we all miss…
Yes 1,592 (w) won in every precinct by at least 5 times the no votes
I'm 10ish here. It's one of my more memorable Halloweens. I remember sitting in a chair while my mom did my makeup(My mom loved dressing my little sister and me up for impromptu photo shoots and we loved the excuses to play dress up!) watching my favorite show, are you afraid of the dark. It was one of the warmer Halloweens, which means we didn't have to lug around our coats while trick or treating. Fun times.
You have until Wednesday, May 16th at 5:00 pm EST to link-up your creations ... use keyword JB10-12 if you upload to galleries (including our Flickr Gallery).
What does next year hold? Perhaps another list...I'll see. I find comfort in the fact that I completed most of my list rather naturally, without much fuss at all. This may mean that I am quite driven and ambitious in my cooking desires, or perhaps that I pick my aspirations wisely so as to not set myself up for failure. Or maybe both. Either way, I'm happy. I made pastry and pies and cinnamon buns and spaghetti vongole. And I surprised myself by falling in love with cupcakes. And Buttercream - less of a surprise there.
McKinty has written six adult crime titles previous to THE COLD COLD GROUND (he also writes children’s fiction), but this is his first police procedural novel. Why the change in direction?
Snow Patrol headlined the show. I had heard through the hype-machine that Ed Sheeran was blowing SP off the stage every night. I didn’t get that vibe myself. Not because Ed Sheeran was bad, but because Snow Patrol’s sound and stage is just bigger. Ed can’t… he was one guy beat boxing and layering his own music. Impressive trick for sure… but Snow Patrol sounded way bigger and fuller. Plus they had the lights and screens…
Readers have inquired as to why I stepped-down as as editor of Bp. Williamson's "Eleison Comments" a couple of weeks ago. It is with no little amount of regret that I made this move to step away after roughly 18 highly rewarding months helping, in my own small way, Bp. Williamson to fulfill his duty as a Catholic bishop to preach and defend the faith.
and provides a mechanism to let the processor run a process as per scheduling and
When there is no experience of separation, love ‘for another’ disappears along with hate ‘for another’. There can be only being-in-love, being inside love, the Beloved.
Point Grey Rd & Macdonald – 10:25am
continue with replacing the waist band—and then finally, the hem, since this skirt too, was too long and dowdy looking. Likely I'll get the ironing done, (and some other ironing that accumulated) but I don't think I'll finish the skirt today.
The most that can be said for the dwarves is this: they intended to pay Bilbo really handsomely for his services; they had brought him to do a nasty job for them, and they did not mind the poor fellow doing it if he would; but they would have done their best to get him out of trouble, if he got into it, as they did in the case of the trolls at the beginning of their adventures before they had any particular reasons for being grateful to him. There it is: dwarves are not heroes, but calculating folk with a great idea of the value of money; some are tricky and treacherous and pretty bad lots; some are not, but are decent people like Thorin and Company, if you don't expect too much. Last week's news that the long-beleaguered production of The Hobbit is finally getting on its way, and that certain roles, including Bilbo and Thorin, had been cast, sent me back to the book itself for the first time in nearly a decade. I reread The Lord of the Rings every few years, but The Hobbit is less dear to my heart and thus less frequently returned to. What brought me back this time was the desire to gain some grounding in the text from which to wonder how Peter Jackson and Philippa Boyens were going to adapt the novel, which in my recollection was childish and episodic, into something of a piece with their Lord of the Rings trilogy. With the exception of Martin Freeman as Bilbo (possibly the most inspired piece of casting of the last few years, if only because it's made me realize just how much Bilbo and Arthur Dent have in common), the names being bandied about for the film's major and minor roles left me scratching my head. Richard Armitage, who has smoldered as John Thornton in North & South and as Guy of Gisborne in Robin Hood, seems an odd choice to play Thorin, whose only heroic moment in The Hobbit happens off-page, and who is otherwise pragmatic, unromantic, and avaricious. And to make much of the rest of the dwarfs, who are barely more than scenery in the book, seemed even stranger. Both choices indicate that Jackson and Boyens are trying to create another fellowship to mirror the one in The Lord of the Rings, and to focus the film on derring-do even though it's mostly through trickery (and a lot of luck) that the day is won. For a while in the early aughts just about every adaptation of a fantasy novel into film was marred by its producers' thoughtless determination to imitate the epic style and scope of the Rings films, whether or not the source material could support this--the first Narnia film was a particularly bad example. Looking at the casting for Jackson's Hobbit, I couldn't help but wonder if he was in danger of making the same mistake.
2 packages Portuguese Sausage (Linguisa and Kielbasa ok too)
Monty is training for his black sash in kung fu and spending lots of time complaining about being bored when he should be practicing. He also enjoys carrying chickens around and doing kind things for his brothers. And also tormenting them.
The impairment of vision in the lazy eye occurs in three phases. In the first (suspension) phase, the brain turns the weaker eye on and off. In the second (suppression) phase, the brain turns off the lazy eye indefinitely.
If we stand divided, how can Pakistan be a united entity?
This one I am naming “Dandelions”. I intend to use the fabrics above and sew it into a wall hanging for our spare bedroom. It will go really well with the existing beadspread and drapes. I got the idea when I drove up to the church this Sunday and noticed the grass starting to turn green along the building and the dandelions starting to bloom. Always a cheery and welcome sight, at spring’s first blush. Not so welcome as summer establishes herself. I might change it to four block squares and scatter the colours more. I’ll decide when I get that far and how ambitious I feel at the time.
So, while 60 certainly isn’t normal, it’s pretty darn good. In terms of predicting what’s still to come … well, that’s a dangerous game for anyone and an extremely inaccurate one when it comes to Austin, who sits all alone is his own little category of patients (or patient, singular, since he’s the only one with quite his history of procedures and risk factors). But she did say that this little kidney could last and last … three more years, five more years, ten more years.
Self-pity is one of, if not the, least attractive all human traits. As soon as I catch myself wallowing in the throws of it (which is pretty often) I make an effort to grind it down to a fine powder. It’s downright unmanly.
R - And what about the John Barleycorn blog, Howard? Where will it be going this year?
Very few people have heard of Rosamund Pilcher, and those who have are probably eighty and called Doris. She has written three fantastic books and many many mediocre stories and always ends up with the Barbara Taylor Bradfords and Catherine Cooksons in the romance sections of charity shops, but she doesn’t deserve that. Coming Home is one of my all-time faves.
They also include coupon codes to use for the products they send and also a description card with all the items, which I put in a cute frame for the picture purpose :)
I've managed to take the giant mess of nails and hooks down from this wall and hang double the number of rotary rulers, store my rotary cutter, pens, starch, and miscellaneous tools needed next to my ironing / cutting area all on the wall.
“Our” apartment is now “my” apartment. It would seem two lives would continue on in “our” place, but it appears there’s now only one life, “my” life in “my” apartment. It’s always helpful in the illusion of verisimilitude to make sure that a left-handed character on page 218 stays left-handed on page 298. When you’re in character, try and remember that your character is married, and don’t slip up.
He's trying to kill me! I'll always remember him too, and not how things are now.
I'd like to send a special Mother's Day shout out to the mothers in my family.
Ji-Hyun Hong : Of course shows. More shows. I want to play on a much more bigger stage.
This Wednesday Saks Fifth Avenue Off Fifth at the Legends Outlets is hosting an exclusive shopping event to kick off this years Duck Derby! The Duck Derby has moved to Schlitterbahn water park, and it will be a fun way to welcome the derby to the Legends neighborhood.
to a coffee lovers dream
a talk when he came straight towards me and asked a
According to the framework agreement, the signing will be open for one year to allow Egypt and Sudan join the rest of the countries.
